That official NGC statement establishes that the CL Financial group was known to have been in very serious financial difficulties as far back as November 2008 – after all, over a three-month period CIB was unable to repay in excess of $250M in matured deposits. Given the high degree of trust between the CL Financial group and the government of the day, that breach must have been known at the very highest level.
No, I don’t. I don’t think that anyone likes to write. I like having written. Writing “The End” on a novel you’ve just completed is the greatest orgasm of relief and joy that anyone can ever feel. Everything that occurs prior to that is just so much horror.
3 other peoples social security medical benefit cards.
I wanted to make a project rather than a card so I set off to make a treat box...It was actually a little smaller than I anticipated so could heavily decorate it but never the less I still like the end result...
Somewhere in the tension between Dora and Pevan, Rel found himself. Slowly, he began sifting the jumble of mental noise for sensations that belonged to him. The splitting headache was obvious, and the damp cheeks felt right, too. Gritty eyes went with that. Overusing Clearsight tended to make you tear up. There was a stiff ache in his neck and something uncomfortably pointy poked into his cheek.
(And as the saying I have seen on pinterest goes)
Rea: I’ve had my novel sitting in my drawer for years. Now that I’m a nonfiction writer, I panic that fiction might not see the light of day. But, my fiction has always fought with the truth, which is why I naturally gravitate to nonfiction. Since I just wrote a book about relationships, I would love to write a book based on living a balanced life. As I mentioned earlier, health means paying attention to what you feed your body, how you move your body, and who you share your body with. I think they all work together to create the definition of wellness. And yes, I am serious about a cookbook! I want to show people how easy, healthy, and delicious eating a plant-based diet can be. No fake meat. No complicated recipes. Just quick, simple recipes that mimic a lot of regular American fare.
Briefly Noted, Too
T.T Beat all of his ghosts in Abandoned Amateur Race. It DOESNT awning the new unlockable stages
Gave her back a stroke, the feathers soft and smooth. Like I was saying goodbye.
The technology is already being tested in Leicester, and the scientists hope their findings will help councils all around the country improve environmental planning and traffic management issues.
Frank Chikane is currently a Pastor of the Apostolic Faith Mission of SA (AFM) in Naledi, Soweto, the President of the AFM International, and is involved in business, including offering an advisory service to companies that do business on the African continent.
recorded live at Haus der Berliner Festspiele, Main Stage, November 4, 2011
There’s room for a little silliness in life, right? (And considering what some of you out there are going through right now, there’s room for a LOT of silliness in my life.)
Was borne on me this morning,
Iron Man – Black Sabbath
I have an ongoing debate with a friend about the color orange and whether it's a boy, girl, or gender neutral color. I hold firm to the belief that it's gender neutral (and a refreshing relief from yellow), while she's in the "boy color" camp.
So what about my teenagers?? Well it's a long time since we've done any kind of traditional "school work". My oldest just turned 18 (how did THAT happen!!) and he left school when he was in Year 5. My second oldest is 15 and he left school when he was in Year 3. Since then (after about one week of grade level, schoolish workbooks), our life has really been totally free-form, free-ranging, come-what-may..... We've done what we wanted to do, when we wanted to do it. We've been to interesting places, done interesting things, met interesting people, and also done a whole lot of ....... NOTHING!
"We are looking for an independent consultant who can work with us in certain projects -- either on an hourly basis or on the basis of some other arrangement. Regarding location and language, we are based in Sweden but need not restrict ourselves just to someone based in Sweden (though it's always simpler and cheaper to work together with someone in your own country).
I used to take one verse, cherry pick it, turn it into a club and beat the piss out of someone for not seeing what I see in the verse. You know.. the correct way of interpreting it and then using it as a rule to leave by.
No I am not sick if that is what you think from the title of my blog, though the focus of this is on my trip to Brimingham. After getting up at the crack of dawn, I took a long drive down the M1, M69 and M6 to head to where I need to be. I had been warned by others that the M6 is a road not to mess with, however I managed it ok, I guess its because I went so early and because it was a great morning. Even though it has been a while since I set foot in Birmingham, it made a change driving into the city, rather than catching a train in. The place is question I was heading to was Archibald House, where the BBC film the TV series ‘Doctors’. All of this came out of the blue yesterday when I received a phone call from one of the producers, who invited me to meet the team behind the series. It was a good thing as I mentioned before that I went earlier than the time I had arranged as I’d heard the motorway can be a nightmare. Despite my satnav constantly telling me to make a u-turn, I felt like I was literally going round the bend until I saw the street near to where I needed to be. I just pulled into one of the car parks and saw a police car with a BBC sign in it, and although I was over an hour early I decided to wait before playing the explorer. Luckily I saw someone who had just pulled up onto the site, and I asked him about where Archibald House was. He then asked me what it was in connection with and after mentioning that I was meant to be meeting one of the producers, the guy introduced himself as one of the dubbing mixers for the series ‘Doctors’, and showed me where I needed to go. So it really was a stroke of luck meeting someone who is part of the team.
I just realized that I need to put up a string of lights in here somewhere. I have put Christmas back in the box about a week ago, with the exception of a string of lights above my kitchen cupboards. I like to turn off all the lights in the kitchen and just leave those on, I enjoy the soft glow, so there ya have it, if anyone knows where I can get a pretty string of 'unusual lights' (just cuz) then please let me know! ;)
toppings: sour cream, crushed tortilla chips, shredded cheddar, jack, or mexican blend cheese, diced avocado, minced cilantro
I didn’t really have a plan, other than just to walk around and see stuff. There are several parks and monuments (Chile seems to like monuments) so I just soaked up the atmosphere.
1 Box European Salad Mix
“I’m an artist,” Marley said as he chased the seeds, lumber, along with most of the grass, out with his pinky. “I seek perfection.”
-Jennifer McLagan's Fat: An Appreciation of a Misunderstood Ingredients, with Recipes . Many ideas on how to use browned butter. And while we're on the subject of the much-maligned three-letter F-word, how to get the best out of everything from schmaltz to graisse de canard, not to mention lard, suet and tallow.
Dominic Ochoa
In a recent post I argued that an important role for art was as a means of communication. At least, that’s how it is often intended, the artist ‘saying something’ to an audience: “This here is bee-yoo-tee-fuhl” or some such. And how poorly or well supported some of the Arts are is quite probably the result of how effectively artists are getting their message across. Why would something be supported if it was not understood? If art is trying to be understood, trying to be appreciated, it does this only by communicating.
The bands were great. First one I saw was A Day to Remember and they rocked the crowd. Kept control really well. Their third to last song, I think it was their third to last song, they played the lead singer got into a giant plastic hamster ball and ran around the crowd. Which was completely awesome.
You also need to consider cost when you are purchasing espresso beans. The more expensive the bean, the better the flavor will be. When considering cost, you should consider availability. Will the espresso coffee beans be easy to find? Choosing an espresso coffee for your coffee needs relies on these various aspects. When you can find a bean that meets your flavor, cost, and availability needs, you have found the perfect bean.
The truth is, once school started up at the end of August, I've had less time to blog. This school year, a combination of factors has me focused more on my classroom; with 70 students (up from 48 last year), there's more preparation and planning, more responsibility, and a lot more papers and notebooks to read.
Here is my contribution to the hop.
Chico is also home to Chico State University. The campus has an abundance of tress and a gorgeous rose garden. And if you like to party, this is the place to be. = )
Death answers:
According to this bogus claim, actual fuel used- if your test consists of driving the vehicle for under 40 miles at a sedate pace- is actually none at all (not counting the coal burned to charge the batteries).
Very little of value was stolen from the victims during what the police had previously referred to as a "robbery"
My Powerade Tigers shows no sign of distraction as they dumped their first two outings, 2-0. The trade was vetoed and a calming presence was now in effect for the Tigers. Yet we struggle.
Question for you:
BTW, Michael Kohn Gallery, you might want to check what year you're living in before you print up posters. I mean really.
You know...MY Flying Cloud!
My Sweet Prints House Rules print in white is in the brand new issue of Shop till you Drop mag.
16. Unleashed 5.03 (66/107)
2 racial
This report gives the following inventory of plutonium-239 in stock as of September 1994 in metric tons (MT): Rocky Flats: 12.7; Hanford: 11.0; Argonne National Laboratory-West: 4.0; Los Alamos National Laboratory: 2.7; Savannah River: 2.0; Idaho National Engineering Laboratory: 0.5; Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory: 0.3; Others: 0.2; DOD and Pantex plant: 66.1; Total inventory: 99.5 metric tons (MT; one metric ton = 1000 kg); Figure 4, pg. 20.
I certainly think that I can tell the difference. I buy Maryland crab at Laurel Meat Market because the sweet flavor makes special meals. I pass on the Venezuelan packages because I'd rather cook something else. Bland crab cakes are still bland.
House Of The Devil follows Sam, a young college girl who in order to secure the funding to move into a new apartment away from a particularly obnoxious roommate (it speaks well of West’s gift at characterization that said roommate seems ample reason to brave the wrath of Satan) takes a job “babysitting” at a remote country estate. Once there, she is greeted by the sublimely unsettling Tom Noonan (whom West had worked with before on The Roost), absolutely invaluable as the soft spoken Satanist. Noonan has one of the most uniquely sinister presences of any character actor. He moves his strange elongated figure with courtly grace and is never at any moment anything less than unfailingly polite, even as he is chasing the blood splattered Samantha through the woods after a series of unspeakable events he is able to keep the façade of a rational man. His voice never rises above a hushed whisper even when things are at their most dire.
Leah looked me in the eye. “Will we be safe here?”
Yeah, I know, that is actually not a german dish. Hahaha But that's what looked good to me. It was a BIG dish and I was almost not able to finish it (even that it said, it was for the small appetite!). My hubby had a very typical german meal and also felt very full afterwards. The plan was to go for a walk afterwards, but I had just gotten my period and my tummy was just hearting so much, that we just went back to the youth hostel that we stayed in. No more romantic feelings. :-( For the rest of the evening I just lied on the bed with my warm water bottle.
Useful advice for the guest includes:
So flowery. right? I paper pierced the apron and use the same PP for tying around the jar. This was a super quick creation. I managed to create this in merely 10 minutes -from printouts to cutting to coloring and arranging :)). I just love this apron - color and flowers. This is on my wish list ;) shhh!!! :).
was colorblind.
Live & Kicking
Stephen Fry, a huge twit, all round mouth and super luvvie, recently argued that Britain should “redress a great wrong” by returning the Elgin Marbles to Greece, as a gesture to mark the London Olympics.
For the background I inked my swirls cuttlebug folder with blue ink then embossed. My sentiment is stamped on decorative snowflake paper and then finished off wih inked eduges and stickles. My Christmas tree as well as the snowflakes are all done with stickles as well.
2. They had reasonable showers
Used some blue mirri card and red and white striped paper. Coloured image with promarkers and the sentiment are some small rubber stamps. Use a sprelli and a blue gem. Kept the layout really plain as it is a boys card.
But, I haven't disappeared. I have been out and about...
After the dates macerate (my favorite word from last week) in the hot beer for a while, they're supposed to be put in a food processor until mixed to a brown slurry. My food processor chose this moment to give up the ghost. I thought about getting out my immersion blender, but then decided that I'd rather have bits of dates in the cake anyway. So I just chopped the softened dates, and was glad I did--the little pieces of dates added to the textural interest of the cake.
Those who conclude on the basis of the foregoing that anyone with access to ammonium nitrate can build a bomb, are, thankfully, correct only in the sense that such a mixture will, in principle, explode if one knows how to detonate it. Understanding this point requires a certain familiarity with how explosives work.
As French people go to vote, hopefully to vote out the disgusting racist scumbag Sarkozy, and put in office the affable and dour, polite, but de facto representing only somewhat less racist policies Hollande, who will continue the austerity program required by the speculators while pretending to be a socialist, the following op-ed in Le Monde by communist (and former Maoist) philosopher Alain Badiou is useful in clarifying some of the mysteries of lepenism to the non-French reading public.
I love you my little stud muffin.
In France I don't know who to blame. But we're not far behind Britain in the angry and intolerant stakes, and I doubt we ever have been. I do hope we never catch up though.
What does the LORD say to show that, as special as the priests are, they are also subject to the same ordinances? (“Even the priests, who approach the LORD, must consecrate themselves, or the LORD will break out against them.” (Exodus 19:22 NIV) The important thing to know here is that, at this point, there was no priesthood nor were there any priests.)
Unemployment: A Guide to Benefits and Moving Forward
Unfortunately if we don’t pay more at retail or use f2p or another option. Episodic content will become necessary! This wraps up the retail series, tomorrow I will touch on the next major issue facing publishers and developers in surviving the next gen transition.
But you have come down with a rip-roaring case of SSS:
Roger Hodgson's Band Members
Oh yeah, an added bonus is that we get regular days off for planning, a full week off for fall and winter breaks. That’s what I’m talking about.
"Well, that's some coincidence. I'm called 'G' and I'm from Ohio."
I won't try and tell you that this is a great "film". It's not a bad film, but it definitely isn't going on any critics top 100 lists. But I think what this movie does is cut through some bullshit, and really gets to the heart of what many men feel in relationships. It's hard to be happy with the good things we have. The guy has exactly what he could want, but he doesn't want it. I know I've been in this situation (no reference to current situation), and it's frustrating to want to want to be happy, but not being happy with being happy with what you want.
In close up we see Guy Pearce’s face, he plays Snow, an ex-CIA operative who is being questioned. Snow responds to each question with a quip and is promptly punched in the face, disappearing out of shot briefly before reappearing, bloodied, to quip again.
Have soup in the crock pot so all I need to do is make a pan of cornbread and supper will be done! As always, I'm more than a little behind on blog reading!
Jackson pondered for a moment and then said with a smile, “So when we get together on Monday night with the small group we are having church?”
~ William Wordsworth
My fellow New Yorkers remember his last years fondly — he was very prominent on the local scene, with his Italian restaurant Grandpa’s in the Village (customers were thrilled to see him there all the time, sitting at a table smoking his omnipresent cigar), his WBAI radio show and his candidacy for Governor of New York on the Green Party Ticket. When he passed away in 2006, he was not 95 as everyone thought, but 82.
My prediction was right on the mark. She’s already contacted my folks to move this project along a little faster. While I’m sure I can accomplish this on my own, I won’t turn down the help from my folks. They’ve done an amazing job at converting an ol’ barn of a house into a cozy home!
I did the driving because when it's holiday time everybody loves the person
I have no photographs of, nor did I ever meet my Italian grandfather who had to say goodbye to his farm horse after it had returned from WW1. What I know of my grandparents came from the stories of their history by my Italian born mother.
We collected my luggage and walked back to his car, the atmosphere between us was amazing I couldn’t stop giggling and he couldn’t stop holding my hand. All my fears I had at the very beginning had vanished. I know Clayton loves me for me and I love him for him. I wouldn’t have it any other way.
But it was fun to watch the head up the rail so we waited for a bit. And then two minutes into the climb Mum stopped! She'd had enough! It felt like it was straight up and she was not sure she would make it, and coming down looked scary so she did not even make it to the chain railing.
But when lawns start to exercise their right to strike, you have to ask if it hasn't all gone a little too far.
ZP: No, I know what you mean. I wouldn’t go so far as to say...I certainly don’t think we’re doing anything disingenuously. I feel that it’s very important for me to do things that are serious, but not so serious to the point of...I don’t know. I feel there is this sort of difference between authenticity and integrity, and that in order to be a real artist/musician you have to be this certain kind of way. Generally, that kind of way is humorless, self-serious and smug. And I think there are a lot of people who maybe see what we do as being those things, but I feel like it’s the same thing as Leonard Cohen or Morrissey. I think there is this notion in both of those cases that there are these incredibly dower, smug, sad, and melancholy creators, but when you actually pay attention to the work they do there is a lot humor in what they do. And it kind of escapes a lot of people because it is presented in such a way that you have to dig for it. And I feel in terms of our visual ascetic, and the things we do with videos especially, most of those things have been fun and intended to be kind of humorous.
STUPID SHITTY SHU
The processing of the new Samsung flagship is much more mature too – it introduces very few oversharpening artifacts and loses little detail, while still managing to keep the noise under control. The One X on the other hand is a bit too aggressive with the sharpening and isn’t doing nearly as good at removing the noise.
Went and stood among the stash. Okay, I need to have a loom warped and a loom ready to warp, so what to use? Oooh ... the massive cone of dusty blue 6/2 cotton, and its pal, in royal blue. Okay, that's a start. But cotton? I don't need a cotton scarf.
I have been dropping a couple of bucks here, and a fiver there for about the last four years. The return to collecting years. In some instances, I have dropped a Jackson or a Grant on a card. But it's the little three-buck deals that are probably messing with my checking account balance. I have no clue what I spent on cards last year.
I spent the better part of a decade either ignoring them, or wishing I had the option of taking them off and on like a pair of shoes. Though if I really had that option, my breasts probably would have ended up being stored in a shoebox on my closet shelf, collecting dust, until they shriveled up into two pitiful, peach-colored raisins.
we also spent some time walking through the blocks long open air market they have in downtown Charleston. I bought some sweetgrass trivets. I love the sweetgrass baskets that many of the artisans make, but can't afford the prices. I understand their need to price their work, but my pockets just aren't that deep.
But, as in an earthquake, the next stage is the mess you alone deal with. Everybody else will have moved on. You deal with the clean up, the re-building, the healing.
Thank you for January, thank you for February, thank you for what you did last month, thank you now for April.
Just for Fun:
This sounds sort of weird.. but I’ve always envied people with the magic touch. Some people definitely don’t have it, and you end up feeling really awkward and uncomfortable inside. I’m not even a particularly touchy-feely type person either. If anything.. I’m ridiculously ticklish. But some people can comfort you with just a brush of their hand, and that’s a quality I’d love to have. I feel my motherly instinct kicking in sometimes… it’s bizarre to say the least.
We did see a few museums in our less-than-twenty-four-hour sojourn in DC, but even my giddy excitement over reassembled dinosaur skeletons wasn’t quite enough to make me feel like I atoned for the disappointment of so many years previous.
However, it would be a bummer if these were five little roosters, because they will for sure have a short life before they are key ingredients to chicken soup.
I did, however, find something at Bank Left's Secret Garden Exhibit (Nelson made this, same artist who painted my painting, he has a way with making these displays). There are little treasures hidden among the flowers. I love it. Even Brian was impressed. I came home feeling refreshed instead of tired. (click to embiggen)
In the 3rd season of One Tree Hill there is a major story arc about a character named Jimmy who appeared in the pilot episode and then reappears 3 seasons later. He was a good friend of the main character Lucas but as he explains they just grew apart. Lucas became the popular kid and Jimmy was the bullied loner.
In the book, Potts writes that this is what Jennet said:
freshly prepared concentrated pandan juice should be used within 2 days, or freeze using ice-cube tray for later use.
Graphics: The characters are all sprites one in a 16-bit kind of style with a bit more detail. Not too great, but they look good. The rest of the art is phenomenal the backgrounds, portraits, and cutscenes are beautiful for a GBA title and look even better on the PSP. All the art in the game can be viewed as you find it from the main menu after collecting a certain in-game item as well.
Part 1
Smugly, you smile and make them guess. The ingredients list will raise some eyebrows. It starts out normal enough: watermelon and lime. Then it gets spicy: cilantro, arugula, Thai chilies. Then things straight up get weird: radishes, feta, soy sauce, sunflower seeds.
- 29th: Got the job at Kohl's! Yay! -
put a great outfit together with pieces many of us have and don't think can make an awesome look. Well, I've learned to appreciate better those piece of clothes since when I start blogging, thanks to girls like Fashionable J. who has great ideas and a great style, Ohhh and did I mentioned how original she is? Well, she definitely has it all.
While I didn't like every thing I tried, I did indeed try it.
The DEA’s story was that Chong was simply “forgotten.” A likelier explanation is that he was ignored, or even singled out for deliberate abuse. Chong shouted and screamed for help, kicking against the heavy door of his cell. Although his hands were cuffed, he managed to tear a small fragment from his jacket, which he shoved
(vi) Special Officer (Copyright) – 01
Arriving at the course, I decided to get a cup of coffee before putting a few balls to get used to the speed of the green. My playing partners, Frank and Al meets me at the tee box, ready for a round of golf that took 30 years in the making. Al wins the draw and tees off first. Like always, Mr. Consistent drives it up the middle of a long par 5, lined with large trees that reaches the sky. I’m next and I manage to drive it past Al and into the middle of the fairway as well. Frank is next and he pulls it left into the towering trees.
Someone asked me the other day: “This post makes me wonder how you would describe the high calling of working in a video store?” I confess that I find it difficult to practice the presence of God at work. It is extremely difficult to find God in the faces of mostly unhappy and lethargic people who are convinced that we charge too much for our rentals and that it is perfectly unreasonable that their credit card should be on file with our store. I wonder to myself: How can I find God in the face of a customer who is intent on renting the latest installment of ‘American Pie’ or the most recent Zalman King exploration of the world of porn? How can I find the face of God, I’d settle for a burning bush, when a customer is challenging me to a fist fight in the parking lot because his credit card was declined?
Parents, guess what? You have a huge amount of control over what your kids read, wear and watch. You don't need to further empower the nanny state - the one we thought we were getting rid of - to tell you what's right and wrong for your offspring.
1 onion, cut in thin wedges
Update on May 2, 2012: I DID get to meet Louise on one if their visits here!
Bees face many challenges, and beekeepers can help increase healthy honeybee populations. In pesticide-free areas especially, even if you don't want to be a beekeeper, you might like to offer some of your land (or rooftop even) for someone else's hives. As well as producing honey, having bees on site helps increase the productivity of gardens, farms and orchards.
At 9 AM, Keith was just getting home from practice. We leave for church at 9:30. I had two kids dressed for church, and I was ironing my clothes. One of the boys was still in a pajama shirt and no pants. Nobody had socks or shoes just yet.
After working eleven nights straight, I finally get a couple of nights off. I almost forgot what it was like to relax and just veg out for a while! This last week has been a tough one, with fighting a cold, a toothache, and the weather.
Keep your fingers crossed. With any luck, this recession will end, my husband will resume his busy travel schedule and I will regain full custody of the pillow.
I still haven't decided whether I will be taking BrewDog up on their offer. But, if I do, it won't be because I think that this will make me fantastically rich. It won't. Buying four shares would give me 0.00036% ownership of the company.
Nope. Nada. Nothing.
If a commemorative statue, of a person on a horse, has the horse with both front legs in the air, the person died in battle.
Do you like to listen to music while you write?
Its got really exciting here in the Abbey this week! I'm sure I cant be alone in thinking that the build up to Christmas, particularly the week before is almost as exciting as the day itself?!?
Best of luck to those who are doing Sally Quilford's 100K in 100 Days. I'm probably opting out of that, but I'll be cheering you on and writing from the sidelines!
By Jim Garamone
Decades
It was just three short years ago the Dr. asked if we were “ready to have the baby?” It was 4 days before you were scheduled. She thought something just didn’t seem right. You’re growth had slowed down for the last week. And your pulse was slower than what it had been for all the other check-ups. As it turned out the umbilical cord was wrapped around your neck. It wasn’t bad at that point, but it’s a good thing we didn’t have to wait. I am very grateful to have the wonderful doctor that I have.
"Better than another day in their hands." He glanced back towards the doorway, his pallor turning his face to stone. "Look, there's stuff I haven't told you. I have an idea of what I'm going into, but there's no time to explain. You coming?"
Many of these recipes are rooted in history, weathering the resiliency of time and are as sound as the massive oaks landscaping our Southern Gulf Coast. Many are ones we just love to eat. I am proud to share these with you.
09. Outside Now (7:10)
Ben-David interviewed several squadron leaders, pilots and other officers. He noted that some of the IAF personnel, “it is likely, will not return from the mission.” An officer named Gilad said it would be “naive” to think there would be no losses.
I propose that NRK’s article has nothing to do with demography, however great the number of socio-economic-attitudinal variables it has thrown into the Marxi-mixer to come up with a profile of antijihad sympathizers. The assorted tags include: men, over-65, primary-school education, childless, unemployed, homebound, lonely, obsessive, distrusting society and democratic principles, angry, frustrated etc.
Nashville Dec 13th 1862
haha, kind of sounds a bit lame when i actually put it into words. you’re already blogging madison, helllloooooo…
Or crap it out on the floor.
2 cups filtered water
Check it out if you are a Creighton user, or have always wanted to be one. Now’s your big chance.
After Thompson’s departure, the program went through a seven-year period of .445 ball under two different coaches. Dick Campbell coached for four seasons. Campbell came to The Citadel after an enormously successful run at Carson-Newman, where he had averaged 25 wins per season in his last seven years as coach. At The Citadel, however, Campbell would finish with a record of 45-54. He left the military college to take the head coaching job at Xavier. His career as a college coach would end two years later, after a 3-23 campaign for the Cincinnati school.
P.S. Most of the guys were engineering majors. That alone made me feel more pathetic about my pitiful English degree than anything else. And the likely hood that my future will look something like this:
Three Second Bar,
Lack of sleep has always been associated with health problems, but recent studies suggest that it could also increase your calorie consumption by as much as 500 or more calories a day! Now whether that's caused simply by the extra time awake being used to eat, or some other factor, has yet to be determined. This is yet another reason to get a full night sleep whenever possible, although not by hitting the snooze button, which has it's own set of consequences.
He wanted to leave something special for him
Sometimes, I discovered, you have to think back to front, down instead of up, sideways instead of straight ahead.
“I shot Will,” I say, “while he was under the simulation. I killed him. He was going to kill me, but I killed him. My friend.”
Certainly there was nothing Tom could have done to prevent getting appendicitis, but it was a big reminder of how important it is to take care of our bodies. He works too much, sleeps too little and knows that he needs to lose a few pounds. But that's all easier said than done, as we all know. He needs to have a sleep study done because the ENT thinks he has sleep apnea. Add that to the list of fun things we can do while he's off from work for a few weeks, haha!
" Do these guys not have a home?"
I did add some textured stamping and some color added with bottle caps for an additional layer of texture.
The trouble is that the only way through is being completely honest. Bugger. I can’t pretend this one away. It’s weird cos for the first time, I feel that I’ve created a situation where I’m shifting some patterns and I know the friend I’m staying with actually loves having me here. She is not just tolerating me. I’ve only ever had this with my sister who’s house I know I could just rock up at, any hour, day night, with no time limit and have a monster basket of love and acceptance thrown my way.
He has no leisure to love, still less to make himself loved. The taste for fine arts, which is so closely allied to the pleasures of the heart, is forbidden him. If, emerging from his industrial sphere, a young man displays a passion for Mozart or Michelangelo, he loses public esteem. Fortunes are not made by listening to sounds or looking at colors. And how chain to the accountant’s stool one who has once known the charms of a poetic life?
I am moving on to CISPA,brand new fruit on our tree
The “Sarawak Report” has in-depth investigative reports and detailed exposé to show that the relegation of democracy to a form of governance merely allowing the people to participate in electoral exercise serves the interests of the Barisan Nasional leaders, their family members and their cronies.
Most accounts place Bashah as the Mentri Besar-in-waiting, an idea that he tries to downplay but you could tell that he liked the sound of it because his face immediately broke out into the sweetest of smiles.
Just in case I haven’t convinced you…consider the cute factor! From fire engines to gumball prints, and soft pastels to bold & bright colors, there is a cute factor for every bum! I think you will all agree that cloth diapers are much cuter than anything disposable on the market!
I plan to join a new club this fall – the Sun City Ukulele Club! From my guitar-picking days, the cords should come back quickly. More than likely, ukulele music doesn’t enter the body through the skin like a harp, but it just might rouse someone out of a deep sleep.
and it made me smile :) ...
Kellerweis is a light and refreshing beer with deep complexity of flavor. The yeast provides hints of fruit flavors and spices, including ripe banana and clove. This hazy-golden beer glows with suspended yeast creating a velvety texture; perfect for a sunny California day. Sierra Nevada's Kellerweis Hefeweizen will be available in 6-packs starting in early summer 2009.
Price: $4
We headed to the North West and checked the area around Vyeboom Dam and when coming up empty handed we continued on our Northern boundary to Voel Dam where we were spoilt to yet another breeding herd of Buffalo. This time we watched as they made their way to have their late afternoon drink before heading off to feed until dark. While sitting with them we received news that a herd of plus/ minus a thousand had made it's way into the Tsharalumi riverbed and were drinking from pools stretching over a number of kilometres. Quite the sight I'm sure but having seen the herd in the morning and once before that, we chose to continue our search for Leopard. Our afternoon was to be relatively productive with us finding, Steenbok, not forget, Elephant, that seem to be around every corner of the
A lawyer for the authorities trying to claw back tax from these shops is quoted as saying "No one would claim that Ikea is not selling furniture just because the clients have to assemble that". But then again, if the authorities put a levy on pre-assembled furniture and left flat-pack stuff tax free, I'm damn sure there'd be lots of shops springing up to help assemble that flat-pack stuff.
next we went to romagiorre for a quick 10 minutes, just to take a peak.
. . . In sum, we conclude that any unfairness or inconsistency that would arise from permitting DHS to assert sovereign immunity in the present case is not so substantial as to cause us to diverge from the general principles of waiver that we have laid out in this opinion: that a waiver generally does not extend to a separate lawsuit, and that any waiver, including one effected by litigation conduct, must be "clear." Accordingly, we reject BPMC’s first theory as to why DHS should be prevented from asserting sovereign immunity in this case.
Vietnam Airlines said nearly 200,000 British people visited Vietnam and other nations in Indochina every year, and that it was expanding its network in this potential region and building connections with other regions.
After also adding enormous slugs of olive oil and mixing thoroughly, I then spread the stuffing onto the pork pieces which I had previously bashed with a rolling pin to flatten slightly. I trussed each piece in a somewhat haphazard fashion to stop them falling apart in the cooking process and drenched with more oil before placing in a warmed oven at gas mark 4 for just over an hour, basting every so often with the meat juices.
me before!
Prince Albert: I should find one to play it with you, not for you.
At Elandslaagte we turned off onto a farm road, which went through several gates, which were mostly open at this time of the year, but in summer when the crops are planted they are closed to stop the cattle wandering in the fields. At the end of this road lived a school teacher Cosmas knows, and we went to see her, but she had gone into Ladysmith and would not be back till 2:00.
“The attempt to blacken his image with the gambling and drinking allegations would not work in the Chinese community because they do not view these things negatively. In fact, they can better identify with him,” he said.
Diary, dear diary
I thought it was expecting around 5 but 7.50 is rip-off.
Not all pets are created equal, however – the more support a dog provides, the better off his or her owner is. Specifically, the more a dog makes an owner feel socially connected, good about him/herself, meaningful in his or her existence, and powerful, the more that owner enjoys a host of positive outcomes (greater self-esteem, lesser depression, lesser stress, etc.).
Luckily I have a job that effects people in a positive way. And a singer who writes things who inspire people. I recognize that, and this is one of a few career choices that I find worth in. That doesn't mean what people do isn't worthwhile, this is just my personal set of unfounded expectations for the world. You have to do what you have to do to get by, and a self-righteous point of view doesn't always fit into that. But if there is anything this little documentary taught me, is that we ALL can be doing something more. No matter what position you're in.
Henry DeTamble is a man out of time. Cursed with a gene that gives him only a loose grip on the present, he slips in and out of the past and future, always arriving naked and not knowing when or where he is.
Last night I was perusing news stories online and came across a video that literally brought tears to my eyes and made me miss my husband so very much.
Imagine spending $3,000 dollars on something. Now imagine that this “something” is simply fast food. Ouch. All that hamburger ever gave you was a tire around the waist. And maybe the sensation of extreme hunger one hour after consumption.
(Being part of a joint blog - optional)
My observation on the front: I wonder if this is an older photo of Thon -- something from earlier than 1984 -- because he barely played any of the season. But, then, it could be from spring training of that season.
In a large skillet over medium heat, heat the sesame oil and add the green beans. Add the soy sauce and cook until beans are tender-crisp.
If you are in Matric or know anyone who is, you owe it to yourself to tune into 89.5FM and listen to the advice and tips in these programmes.
in the USA. This is why:
She had let out one single Moo when they dropped her off. The guy said that was the first and only time he had ever heard her do that. She does it a lot here and talks to us at feeding time every morning and night.
I put my mind to something difficult and saw it through.
Plus, when you join during Sale-A-Bration, you’ll get a FREE stamp set of your choice!
a clipping from something with leaves would work. You'd just have to remove the leaves and probably
Aisha Harris, 22, New York, N.Y.
Please always, always, be kind.
The Smit murders is but one example of how the cloak and dagger tricks of intelligence services influence world affairs. Similar operations are going on all the time. The popular 007 James Bond series for example, is more authentic than what they seem. It is presented as entertainment, with stunning girls and incredible imagery enhanced with special effects and surround sound, to distract us from reality, and to enforce the notion that the entire presentation is all a fantastic imagined creation, i.o.w. a fantasy!
this is my letter to her from aug or so i sent on myspace that i told you about. i also attached the letter from the plastic surgeon ..
So after all the eating and drinking that continued from last Thursday into the weekend, I decided to go very light Sunday night and picked up a low-calorie cookbook written by Japanese actress Yoko Akino.
27 God is the Lord,
Crocket capital. An Early Gothic form, consisting of stylized leaves with endings rolled over similar to small volutes.
BM: I’d say my two favorite films are The Last Picture Show and Doctor Zhivago, the original with Julie Christie and Omar Shariff, which is just brilliant. I would never watch another version of it. And then The Last Picture Show is such an amazing film. Bogdanovich did it and there are so many amazing actors in it. It’s in black and white and it’s just something that stays with you.
Day Six:
In this particular issue of the publication, I was struck by a letter written by a fairly young graduate of the college ('young' in this context means only 'younger than I am'). She was complaining about the fact that the publication focuses too much on people who have had interesting, successful careers or who are involved in other time-consuming activities such as volunteering. She is a self-described "stay-at-home" mom with 2 young kids, and so she doesn't "see herself" in the magazine. This made her feel alienated and it made her also feel that perhaps, in the eyes of the college, she was kind of a failure.
I go in a trance see a light or just go blank for some time. I feel calm yet restless. Is it a new turning point or a revelation of some kind.
Pete- a normal aged person; considered crazy by the whole population of the valley where he has been staying for times immemorial and so, he has been considered crazy since then. No one knew why it was so. Because one can’t see anything unusual in him- he was completely lucid and normal. There was only one trait of him that bugged people His reply to each and every agonized person that he met. And that reply was- BE silent and hug me.
Good or bad I never question you—I love all—I do not condemn any
46) i dont have time for long goodbyes… so here. (hug and run!)%
A prize package will include a Spellbinders Grand Calibur plus Bazzill Basics Paper, Spellbinder Dies, Le Crystelle BLING-abilities and Justrite stamp products to the retail value of $100
and head straight for Mirjan, which was the next town, but I guess I missed that turn at some point. I tried asking people but they weren’t very sure of where it was so then I just stuck to the road I was on. To my immense relief, about 15k from Kumta the road condition improved, I was on smooth black tar once again. My first sight of the coast was from a bridge over a river that turned and met the sea in the distance. I stood in the middle of the bridge in brain-boiling heat and took a picture. I crossed over and asked at a stall, oota sikta? and they stared back as if I had spoken a foreign tongue, though i was well within the borders of Karataka. And then it sank in, Kannada won't work anymore. They spoke Konkani, a dialect closer to Marathi, spoken all along the coast.
This isn’t one I took, but I just have to share it with you. This is in my neighbourhood. In fact I may just walk past it this afternoon to crow (quietly of course)! Look at the picture and then I’ll point something out to you (other than the obvious).
Written in the imperative form, this could be anything at all. Tell the reader what to do--if that's your style. I advise against phrasings such as Buy BOOKTITLE before it's too late! style commands but do whatever matches your brand or "authorial voice." You have a style; you just need to find it. If you like to just say Subscribe today! then do it. In fact, I use this style a lot at the footers of my blog post, so for me, it's not really a headline so much as a closing sales pitch. No one likes to be told to buy something, though, and if you haven't already heard, books are bought, not sold. (See Branding for Indie Authors to learn more about that subtle distinction.)
“A decision to use destructive force pre-emptively will be taken if the situation worsens,” he said at an international conference attended by senior U.S. and NATO officials, according to the Associated Press.
What do you think of that title? Brew + movie = brewvie. Get it? Erik came up with it, and I think it's brilliant. So, is it a "hellz ya" or "keep trying"? Either way, don't steal it... it's trademarked.
Does that mean I can make wrong choices?
The papers of the speakers presented will be collected in a book edited by Professor Farah called "China's Influence on Non-Trade Concerns in International Economic Law", will be published by Ashgate Publishing (UK), forthcoming in 2012. Beside the English version, there will be an Italian, Hungarian and Chinese version of the book, thanks to the CESL in Beijing.
Our current challenge, Things with Wings (for kids) is open until April 6th at noon CST, so there is plenty of time to make and link a card for chances at great prizes and/or our Top Three. So come join in the fun and after you do, please consider sending in the card to cheer one of our kids in a children's hospital. All the details you need to know are under the tabs above. But you do not need to send in the card to enter our challenges.
Wow What a Year!
We all need to keep talking to make sure that type of society never gains a stronghold again. Right now the stirrings of that same mentality are present and it scares me. The old term “unwed” mothers has made a very unpleasant comeback. The rhetoric of shaming the mother by applying a label and at the same time not labeling the father as an “unwed” father rather just a father, clearly identifies to me the intent and intentions of bringing back the term and applying it to todays mothers.
There are so many talented, genius people out there,
He never gloried in his knowledge. He was a man of great gifts naturally, and after he was converted the Holy Spirit gave him greater gifts still. He was a mighty preacher, and a mighty speaker, and a mighty writer. He was as great with his pen as he was with his tongue. He could reason equally well with Jews and Gentiles. He could argue with infidels at Corinth, or Pharisees at Jerusalem, or self-righteous people in Galatia. He knew many deep things. He had been in the third heaven, and heard unspeakable words. He had received the spirit of prophecy, and could foretell things yet to come. But did he ever glory in his knowledge, as if it could justify him before God? Never! Never! never for one moment!
Your resume (and LinkedIn profile) should be easy to read and should clearly state what you’re looking for, what you’ve done, and why you’re worth interviewing. Keep it simple!
I want them to be brave and free and confident and for that I need to let them go. Equip them with the knowledge and then pray for the best. Tell them to trust their instincts and hope they will bring their worries to me as we cuddle after lights out for goodnight chat.
Tito: "Dios mio, un gato!"
So what is the solution?
Febraury 3, 2012: On February 6, you will be able to follow the Halton District School Board on the social media forum, Twitter. This new venture for the Halton District School Board will allow followers to keep current on “tweets” about system issues, regional events, and matters of interest to students, staff and the community.
- Commercial laminated beams and steel pieces used for a temporary exhibition are now part of the main structural elements..” Sustainability, repurposed materials, privacy, nature, views..
I have had some thoughts on my mind since this woman opened her big mouth in the media recently.
Now, with man being the inherently fallible creature that he is, these groups probably beat on each other with clubs and spears for a while, but they most assuredly partied (feasted) with each other too. Back then a feast had an entirely different meaning though. Stuffing your gullet at the local Golden Corral for under ten bucks this was not.
Lieberman blasts Ashton UNRWA in 1966 saw no problem giving aid to terrorists PA cartoon criticizes Palestinian leaders for deaths in Gaza PA historical revision: Hebrew Shekel coin from 66 CE is “ancient Palestinian coin” UN ‘investigating’ false tweet IDF Chief of Staff meets with Chairman of U.S. Joint Chiefs of Staff ‘He executed the little girl’ Israeli cities misrepresented as “Palestine” in PA TV song Israeli cities misrepresented as “Palestine” in PA TV song The IDF’s base of ‘good deeds’ How he sunk so low 20,562 tons of goods entered Gaza last week In 2011 U.S. Primacy in the Middle East Died; In 2012 The Funeral Will Be Held A Christian tells the Jews of Europe it’s time to come to Israel The EU and PA collaborate to destroy Oslo AvitalLeibovich: Today I am interviewing high school graduates wishing to join the #IDF spokesperson Unit. #elite youth Асад готовился к другому Армагеддону Home Front Command Haifa District gets permanent home Первый шеф “Моссада” by alexstupnikov Hamas welcomed to Geneva
Aha! Kitchen cabinets! Get the paper towels!!!
2. Bird On A Wire
Philosophy of Mind: Is the mind like a computer program?
Entry #56
and I'm too hungry right now to figure out which
04 - ersal hickey - hangin around
license to ask for help and admit vulnerability, to just Be A Girl.
That’s my recipe for the week. If you made a vegan recipe and would like to share be sure to link up below. Happy Friday!
Cricket blogs are a species of crickets are generally very loud and are wrapped closely to the latest cricket updates is happening in cricket are very useful in familiarizing cricket lovers with the cricket updates live and post match analysis. Cricket podcast download is like a whole world of cricket. On a cricket match, despite missing out live cricketing action. When you have to make some quick bucks. It was a game that was played predominantly by women and children in the cricket updates live and also number of roast ducks they would have been made for these cricket stats can talk about it. Generally, the live cricket updates of cricket forum.Well, for a game played in the live cricket updates of England too. Today, cricket is governed by BCCI and BCCI is richest board of cricket players. Cricket fan put not only action packed cricket wallpaper rises high among cricket lovers can give own version of reviews, predictions or briefed report of game going on and nothing can stop them from enjoying the latest cricket updates or even back to give all sorts of expression of your cricketing heroes; you can indulge in talking about all the latest cricket updates can get varieties of cricket sites means catering to the cricket updates live of finances.
Greek Feta
The passenger apologized and said, "I didn't realize that a little tap would scare you so much."
% IN LAIR: Nil
The kind words.... even on the bad days, when all he might be able to string together was: "Thank You"...... he got 'em out.......
So your turn if you havent been over to the blog to checkout the rest of the teams creations please do.
The story you are about to read is true. Some names have been changed to protect the less-than-innocent…
"Why do you ask?" I texted back, playing it cool while my head nearly exploded.
42 Meaning of Life, the Universe and Everything Flash Fiction Competition
This is why Positive Light for Positive Living Books is offering an incredible discount price to international and nationally recognized youth organizations, with hopes that these organizations will incorporate Honorary Mother’s Day Award in their fundraising endeavors. To learn how your organization can qualify for this remarkable discount offer, contact Positive Light for Positive Living Books at 734-680-5370.
I am not a fan of brightly lit Studio work especially with new-borns so to keep them in their own home, under the temperature they are used to and to shoot under what available light there is suit’s me just fine, it was a challenge with the lighting and the baby being unwell but I loved doing the shoot, I have another 3 to do in the next few weeks so after doing a Christening yesterday too, well to say I’m broody is an understatement – don’t tell my girlfriend!!
To which I am addicted.
Terminated: Deputy Kenneth L. Burroughs Hired: 10/1/96 Age: 42 Idling and loafing during July 1 – December 31 amounted to 172 instances, for a total of 285 hours, or 35 eight-hour work days of inactivity. At his base pay rate – $27.3934 per hour – that amounts to $7,807.11 the taxpayers lost.
in memories you hold dear
it wets
He whispers something my old ears
Drizzle chocolate over tops of cups (or spoon over, as desired). Place in refrigerator about 10 minutes to set, then return to room temperature and serve. They are best eaten that day, but they will keep in an airtight container up 2-3 days (perhaps longer in the refrigerator). Makes 24.
The half-silhouette of a young boy with a machete,
I now believe affirmations are about reminding us to shift our negative focus to a more positive one. They are not magic and are best approached without force or expectation. Let them remind you of the truth that is sometimes hidden by inner negative filters. I tell my clients to keep them simple, at least 50% believable, and always word them in the present tense.
Reading Caregiver's blog about faith and hope today couldn't help but lead me back to XTC's 'Dear God'. You may find this odd (or perhaps not) coming from one who professes a faith in God (you may not have known that, of course) but I think 'Dear God' is a great, great song. I don't mean to abuse Andy Partridge's intention in writing this song - I'm guessing that when he says he is an atheist, he means it - but I, for one, have always found faith and doubt to be very close bed-fellows. I've never been one who has been fortunate enough to to be absolutely certain about the things of the spirit all of the time. There is also the added dimension of how angry we can get with God at times - a rage that I find fully expressed in 'Dear God'. If you look at the words of the Psalmist alone, that all too human confusion and anger is right there in scripture. I suppose it boils down to me being a 'believer' but a rather rubbish one (I have issues with 'the Church', too). I hope God will forgive me (He knows there's quite a list of things I need forgiveness for). And what's more - don't get me started on friggin' nut-job fundamentalists of any hue.
The third of four brothers from a Virginia wheelwright family, Jacob Wheeler seemed very similar to his Lakota wife – the type of person that seemed to know his own mind. The miniseries’ first episode, ”Wheel to the Stars” revealed that Jacob’s Virginia family seemed to view him as a non-conformist . . . or oddball. He, in turn, regarded his hometown of Wheelerton, Virginia; his family and its profession with mild contempt. In short, this young Virginian was a fish out of water in 1825 America and he knew it. This would explain Jacob’s longing to see the world beyond his hometown and the eastern United States. He did not hesitate to express his enthusiasm for the West. After meeting mountain man James Fletcher (Will Patton), he immediately set out to achieve his desire to leave Wheelerton.
Fast forward another couple of years, and sadly I developed some much more serious medical problems. Thankfully I made it through those too. However, as a way to deal with the shock of that serious illness, I re-evaluated my approach to food and drink.
Drug cartels battling over routes into the United States, the primary destination for drugs like marijuana, cocaine, heroin, and methamphetamine, as Marc Lacey writes in The New York Times:
The Large Bear can do better than that.
Would I try it again? Probably, yeah, but I wouldn't go out of my way to. Still, that's another one from the vaults that I can 'tick' off.
To rise with the remorseful feeling,
I'm sitting in a cafe. The table is piled with my children's school books. I had been working on school lessons, but my heart's steady beat of write-write-write won't be ignored.
During the 1930s Wandrei wrote two more (non-fantastic) novels and several plays, one a collaboration with his brother Howard but none were published although they were submitted to various publishers and agents.
bargain you negotiate. It is a fact-of-life — of your every
We all know the two sides to the lolita community. You've got the frilly princesses of manners on one hand and the cattiness and anonymity which the internet provides. It's discouraged a lot of girls and some just don't get involved with their communities anymore. Lolita secrets can be brutal, cgl worse and gtfoegl is an open shout out badmouthing others. Is it a wonder that we can get ourselves a reputation?
On the other side of things, a cousin posted this on facebook: "Isn't the whole point of living for God making sacrifices daily and not for 40 days out of the year? And God Only cares about our spiritual choices and things that will affect our spirit...not about things like whether we eat meat or not...I just don't understand why the church would have you sacrifice something natural like candy...that doesn't cause spiritual gain in my opinion...unless like you said you give up something that takes up your time... It seems to me that sacrificing by mowing a neighbors lawn or helping out your mom... will only make you a better person...a "GOOD" person I guess you could say...but "Good" people won't be in Heaven, only Godly people will be in Heaven. The Old Testament focused on Natural sacrifices, but that all changed in the New Testament."
To let you have all of me
From bank manipulators.
On paper with pen she recites them out loud,
War is unpleasant, and the Iraq War more unpleasant than most, given its falsified justification and mismanagement. But De Palma's usual talent for immersion in seediness fails him here. He does not capture the repulsion of war; he only makes a repulsive film. As if to ward off the pointlessness of the exercise, De Palma has his characters occasionally spout aesthetic maxims. When Salazar jokingly tells McCoy that his camera doesn't lie, McCoy replies, "That's bullshit because that's all that camera ever does." Later, Salazar more insistently urges, "Just because you watch it doesn't mean you're not a part of it." Naturally, both of these utterances are key positions of De Palma's entire approach and philosophy, but so hear them said aloud here cheapens them. Especially the latter quote; De Palma is a master of implicating his audience, up there with Alfred Hitchcock and Michael Haneke. But this film does not implicate anyone because it is so morally rigid. Casualties of War shows a situation slowly spiraling off its axis until the breaking point isn't visible. These men broke before they even left home. What, then, can we learn of them?
Jack 2:11 Brandon 2: ?
02 - I'll wait (E-smoove vocal mix) (7:06)
In the three shows this quilt competed in, I did learn a bit from the judges, but it certainly didn't change my quilting. Mostly their comments enlightened me about competing and what judges see and don't see.
I decided to add an equally soft glitter with a hint of color. NOPI Here Kim's The Sun is a small hex opalescent glitter in a slightly peach tone base. The glitter flashes green, blue, purple, and peach. It's stunning but this polish will not reach opacity on it's own. I used one coat for this mani. What are your thoughts on soft shades?
You pile up enough tomorrows, and you'll find you are
This web site is tied into my travels in starting a business. I meet tons of people, places and things and like to share. But the best place by far is the property I found on Texada Island. And finally, after 5 years, we have the name: “No Nothing Farm”. This not only honours the off the grid aspect of the property. But it also honours philosophy. Socrates greatest realization: “I know nothing”.
Voila, you must continually better your mental, spiritual, financial and physical self. Jim Rohn says “better to live in a tent with the person you love, than in a mansion by yourself.”
Again, this is all just further proof that I am turning into my parents and pining for “the good old days.” Or it just begs the question that we used to examine in 10th-grade Humanities Core when I was teaching high school English: To what extent does modernization create progress in a society? While our teaching team made sure to offer them a variety of texts, we also read — appropriately so — Chinua Achebe’s Things Fall Apart.
I debated whether I should wait to experience this dish first-hand in the Bahamas before I attempt to cook it at home. But I decided to go for a “climactic strategy,” cooking and tasting my home-made version before having the “real” thing IN the Bahamas. It would be to sort of build up the excitement for my trip and for this popular Bahamian cuisine.
Yardbirds For your love UK
I think you get the gruesome picture, man arrives on a lost continent H.G. Wells would have been proud to conjure, becoming a tasty new entree for the mighty Flying Tiger. Sad to say, the Maori oral history describing small humans being snatched up and flown away to feed hungry nestlings is true. Unfortunately for the Haasts eagle the Maori people adored feasting on the grazing Moa birds and their herbivorous ilk, hunting them into extinction. No Moa, pardon the pun. The doomed Haasts eagle, thought to comprise only 1000 pairs in the best of times, clicked lights out on New Zealand's fantastic lost world of the birds a mere five hundred years ago.
The first of these installments should be available to download from the BBC Doctor Who website for free sometime in June.
That is definitely wrong.
I’ve always prided myself on my normally okay ability to organize things… so of course didn’t for one second consider the possibly impossible task at hand – organizing actors!
And if that weren’t enough, the Vintage Virginia Wine Festival will be taking place about four miles from our house all weekend long. Time to clear some space on the wine rack. I know, tough task. So let’s get down to business. I’ll save you the 13.1 miles and get straight to the wine.
FANNIE STEBBINS WILDLIFE REFUGE
The Metropolitan Police were forced to admit to 'institutional racism' and have a serious crackdown on overt racism in the force. A Home Office report of 2005 assessed the impact of the Lawrence Inquiry on the Met and found that overt racism amongst officers at work is indeed largely unacceptable these days, though homophobia, transphobia, sexism and other bigotry are all still alive and well.
This analysis applies not just to big armies, and not just to discourse, but to all conflict. It certainly applies to stopping civilization from killing the planet. Right now, what are the battlefields on which we are encouraged to - allowed - to fight? We are encouraged to vote. But of course we all know the old Wobbly saying: 'If voting made a difference it would be illegal'. And in any case, our choices of whom/what we can vote for are strictly limited. No matter whether a Republican or Democrat wins, we lose. We are encouraged - allowed - to use the courts, and while of course we may get the occasional win there, we must never forget by and for whom the courts are set up. We are encouraged - allowed - to write, so long as we never mention social change and violence in the same paragraph. We are encouraged to recycle, to shop green (so long as we shop), and so on.
MEDICATIONS TO PREVENT COMPLICATIONS
I've never clung on with such desperate verve!
It is hard to believe that you are not coming back,
As always I slept very well! But I did wake up starving and a creeping headache. After I showered I felt much better, ate a green tipped banana and half a chicken breast. My snack mid morning was a handful of cherry tomatoes, half chicken breast (left over from breakfast), two hardboiled eggs and 1 piece of uncured bacon. Lunch will be yesterday’s leftovers and mid afternoon snack will be similar to yesterdays snacks. I really miss my fruit! I really really do! More REFRESH tea to fill in the VOID. It’s a mint tea so it’s nice and truly refreshing! LOL.
Ob is the Latin root meaning “against”. To be obdurate is to stand against difficulty and suffering. When I fight against the experience of difficulty and suffering, I become hardened in feelings, unyielding, and even stubbornly wicked.
“The lesson that oppressed groups learned from 1848 was that it would not be easy to transform the system, and that the likelihood that ‘spontaneous’ uprisings would in fact be able to accomplish such a transformation was rather small. … Since the states could control the masses and the powerful strata could control the states, it was clear that a serious effort of social transformation would require counter-organization — both politically and culturally.”
Damn things don't even wait until night to start calling. They use the creek next to the house as a super highway, and so they're basically a nightly presence. Now, I don't mind wildlife, but I have a philosophical objection to wildlife that has forgotten their place on the food chain.
Revived turned out to be exactly the kind of book I needed at the moment. While emotional, the story still filled you with hope and a sense of life. If I get so involved with a book that it brings tears to my eyes, it becomes a new favorite, and that's exactly what Revived was able to do.
A long, low, moss and lichen encrusted concrete structure appears ahead. Letting my imagination run wild, it could be a remnant of a military installation from the Cold War, or part of a launch structure from the early days of the space race. But, more mundanely, it is actually the ’56 Gates’, a row of sluices built in 1947 to allow waters to be diverted onto an area of floodplain rather than valuable agricultural land in times of inundation.
Splotchy is a coyote.
She lives with her own hero of many years. Their two children are now grown up and married, and two beautiful grandchildren have arrived. They share their home with "Bob" the dog and two white cats, Boycat and Girlcat.
One day I returned home and learned she was in the ICU. All my arrogance and stupidity went away in an instant, and I bit hard on my lips to hold back my tears of remorse. Peering at a piece of paper gripped in my anxious father’s hand, tears flooded my face.
2) Ask for the resignation of FEMA Director Michael Brown. If he won't give it, fire him. This is not all his fault, but he's not blameless, and there are times that a leader makes a change to restore confidence to workers and constituents. FEMA isn't like being the ambassador to Sweden, or some other non-important cushy post; appoint someone with a job history of crisis management, not someone who needs a political favor.
I am not sure if I like the "new and improved" blogger.
Mr. Dale, author of a book about individual relationships with God, said he has attended Fellowship Church a few times. And he offered some praise: “I’ve got to hand it to them, they are brilliant marketers.”
It's a critical time to speak up; after months of lobbying, the long-awaited National Conference of the ALP is poised to consider either adopting a binding policy in favour of equality or, following the lead of the Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, to permit politicians to vote according to their conscience on this issue.
The WHS Class of 2007 donated a memorial in the form of a stone that now sits on the grounds of Bulldog Stadium, the new home of the Bulldogs, at the new Waterloo High School. The memorial was dedicated in September, 2010 with a pre-game ceremony and then the Bulldogs went on to defeat the Carbondale Terriers. Chris watched over us in 2006 as we started a new tradition in Bulldog Football and he continues to watch the Bulldogs compete today.
I'm far more than a paragraph,
The Black Keys Take Us Back to the Future -
To whom would I recommend this: This really wasn't my favorite vampire book, and it could be that it is fourteen years old, so I'd probably just keep it to myself but I guess I'd recommend it to anyone who's already read all the other vampire books out there and needs something more.
I’m not sure whether I’ve mentioned this before, but I’m a student living in the UK. And the weather is absolutely gorgeous! I like that word-gorgeous. It’s just so…gorgeous. And another word I feel like using a lot, ‘charming.’ Yet somehow, I don’t. Kinda feel over-using it might make it lose its charm.
The reason we don’t see ourselves as “blind” because we not aware of our spiritual blindness. And it is this very blindness that keeps us from assessing our spiritual captivity. We are blind because we have been conformed to the ways of the world and deception by the Kingdom of Darkness that controls the world systems so that we only see what the “god of this world”, Satan, wants us to see.
Oh and the VIP thing is pretty great, you can walk up to the main area and get any pour you want without waiting (but the same is not true at the smaller bars). Also 20 tickets are enough for about three visits. Worth considering if you are going at the heavy Friday and Saturday night times.
It was a nice warm. sunny day to be outdoors doing something strenuous. Furthermore, I drove the reengined Bronce and it preformed great.
If you know me on Facebook, you might know what this is. My sister (I posted about her need for a heart transplant last week) got back after an exhausting trip to Houston and the heart transplant center that would be handling her surgery. They ran a plethora of tests and came to the conclusion she DOESN'T NEED A HEART TRANSPLANT at this time!
Will protect you.
Alas now, this topic inevitably devolves down to our screwy American politics. And while (as I avow repeatedly) every political wing has its anti-science flakes, growing mountains of evidence suggest that one wing has gone especially frenzied in an anti-scientific snit. Or else (as that wing contends) science itself has become corrupted, top to bottom, rendering "evidence" suspect or moot. Let's examine both possibilities.
The perfect day. Charlotte and Russell wed in a beautiful outdoor ceremony at Ross Priory on the banks of Loch Lomond. It was a wonderful celebration of the marriage of two handsome and joyful people, made all the more special when the same joy was evident in every single guest. Ross Priory is such a picturesque venue and they couldn’t have picked a more fitting setting. The day went off without a hitch (almost!) and we managed to capture some lovely photographs before the skies eventually delivered a thunderous downpour. Fortunately by then, the camera gear was already tucked away in my car and the evening celebrations were well under way with the bride and groom displaying a perfectly choreographed turn of foot on the dancefloor! Have a wonderful life you two, thanks for being such good sports, and thanks to all of your guests for their patience and kind hospitality.
5.) Puzzle
I humbly disagree. Writing in the modern age of TV and film storytelling, authors are behooved to compete by giving "visually oriented" descriptions if not other sensory ones.
I feel the moment of truth is upon us as the barkeep looks one last time at us and then looks over to his lone customer who has been sitting quietly, clearly amused by the scene playing out in front of him. At last the bartender turns to his other customer and says:
One can reach Kedarnath either on foot or by helicopter. The path for coming on foot is 14 kilometers trek from Gaurikund, where one can also find palanquins and horses for hiring. Gaurkund is well connected with Rishikesh, Haridwar,Dehradun and other known hill stations of Garhwal and Kumaon regions by road. The helicopter services are available at Rudra Prayag.
Rejection is like holding a conversation with yourself, only with a matter of months separating the reply from the question. ‘Will they like your work, Dick?’ I asked back in May when I sent the script for a radio comedy to the BBC’s Writer’s Room. ‘They bloody hated it!’ came the answer, written in my own hand, today.
Of course all the chipboard elements are Twiddleybitz.
I've gotten a lot of interest in my paintings and have decided to offer up my works for purchase
@@@ You can check out Fire and the Wheel over here at Sound of Confusion or below. The singer sounds a bit like Jim Morrison from the Doors, they sport a big ass drum sound and they’re arrangements are a bit more orchestral than your standard indie fare. They’re arty if you dig that flow.
That just about covers it for my kit this month. I have one more LO to share, but will do that later. Snow day today. We had snow mixed with freezing rain last night into this morning. So, no school for my middle. I opted not to drive the other into the cities. Hubby said the roads were horrible. They were in the little neighborhood I live in until a little while ago. They are mostly plowed... now to just convince the guys driving the plow truck to get a little closer to the curb instead of three feet from it.
Did you know there were Queensland floods, Japanese tsunamis, earthquakes of New Zealand, Australia and Japan? You would have had to have been living in a bubble not to know this of course! we raised money, offered assistance and saw it on the news daily. The loss of life minimal in comparison to other disasters but the attention and value obviously high.
But yes this is a good beer. Would I buy it again? No, its simply to simple to compete with the complexity that is Arrogant Bastard... so I will continue to buy the Arrogance.
The horse collapsing on the bridge,
When they went out to dinner together, her eyes always roamed...trying to see who was there, and who could further her career. David soon realized he bored his girlfriend.
In Genevieve’s conversations with Bar­ack, her family was seldom a topic. Barack provided an escape from all that, a sanctuary. She felt that she had far more in common with him than with her relatives. “That wasn’t my world,” she said of the social circles of her mother and stepfather and father. “I was through and through infused with the sense of being an outsider, like Barack was.”
Cut the paper to the size you want, making a tiny pencil mark on the correct side (yes, Arches Hot Pressed paper has a correct and an incorrect side : ) ), and carefully immerse completely in the water. I tend to soak the paper for about 20 minutes.
Below, I have typed out some of the more brilliant opening lines (only the first one or two sentences) of fiction novels — some of my personal favourites. Beneath each quote is the answer, so simply highlight the empty space to see it. Let me know how you all do!
In November the appeal was heard and denied and in January 2011 the adoption was granted. He filed two separate appeals which he obviously lost so he appealed to the Supreme Court of Arkansas who heard the case and ruled March 1, 2012.
“Not at all, Mistress”, said Joseph.
Or I should say Trey built.
So with this in mind, I have thought about how I might go about blogging this year. There are heaps of challenges and new link ups to join and I am am a chronic not-wanting-to-miss-outer. You know the person who is last to leave the party, pub, club for fear of missing out on the best part of the night? Anyway I am limiting myself to a couple of longer term projects and I will probably be a bit more sporadic with my link ups.
Watching the red and orange embers climb higher in to the sky, I continued, “The first thing that drew my suspicions was the red rose in the triclinium. It couldn’t have been placed there for me, as if I hadn’t found you, I would probably have met you in the tablinum. Thus I assumed it was put there before, but not too long, as if I remember, the petals hadn’t wilted yet, so maybe, a private discussion between you and your slaves.”
Meet Jack. Jack's a zombie. Jack loves his wife (who is not a zombie). He would never do anything to hurt her. But oh, do her brains smell good.
Watching her feeling her work whiles others watches
Our plan is to head towards Mordor (yes Lord of the Rings), near Lake Taupo, to the southeast, but there may be too much snow, so we will see. All we have heard so far is that it is windy. Mordor, (I’ll get the volcanoe’s real name for you later) is one of three active cone volcanoes and they smoke all the time. We may do some snow hiking if we can rent equiptment. Who knows?!
I think lately I have had some interesting interactions with people. I say "interesting" in the way that I am scratching my head wondering why that person felt the need to say some specific things to me. Then recently someone came right out and commented on my said personality flaw and little puzzle pieces dropped into place. Ahhhh...NOWwwww I get it. OK. I suppose I should have seen that coming.
The moon's a black and white flashback
“No, never,” he said and we all fell over again.
We continued our drive up to Ross Barnett Reservoir where we turned back around. In all, we traveled about 105 out of the 444 total miles of the Natchez Trace. We’re hoping to return at some other time to travel the whole Trace and take advantage of the three free campgrounds along it’s route.
Miss you guys!!
Where would our world be if Christianity had never been allowed to take power? Carl Sagan once wrote that, if not for the descent of the religious dark ages that crushed rational inquiry and stifled human progress, we might have reached the stars hundreds of years ago. We have lost so much thanks to religion in general, and women are still fighting for equal rights thousands of years later. This Christian nation still feels it is their right to govern a woman’s choices regarding her own body. I firmly believe our race and culture will not evolve to the next stage until it realizes the stupidity inherent in religion. Until we rid ourselves of the thinking that still resides in the dark ages. As individuals, we should long for the peace and prosperity of the human race and withdraw from systems of beliefs that only anticipate mass destruction!
"Do I know his parents?! Does he go to church? Where does he live? What kind of grades does he get? Does he smoke? Does he do drugs? Is he a nice boy?"
Trombones: Dan Lewis, Nick Silva, Mike Johnson, Steve Corder
When we draw someone to us, this means a person propels the attraction and feels
What was your first ever story about?
I thank god that the nurses that were on that night knew what to do and thank goodness Dr Lewis got the intraosseous needle into his leg, as this is what saved his life.
It's the Kiarostami I'm especially dazzled by, however (for one thing, it's a far warmer picture than the Breillat, though that's hardly meant as a criticism of Bluebeard). Believe it or not, this is the first film by the famous Iranian auteur I've seen, and I'm still reeling from its incredibly dense interplay between fiction and reality, its humanism and its sheer love of cinema. Inspired by an actual incident of a poor man entering into the lives of a well-to-do family by pretending to be Iranian filmmaker Mohsen Makhmalbaf, Kiarostami—who appears as himself in this film—uses documentary techniques to explore the circumstances behind this ruse, using many of the real people involved and even filming the man's trial. What he uncovers is utterly fascinating and, in the end, deeply moving; turns out, the man was fueled by a passion for Makhmalbaf's films, which he says spoke to him in deeply personal ways few other artists have been able to articulate for him. Who knew that, 18 years before Juliette Binoche confided to Fang Song in Hou Hsiao-hsien's Flight of the Red Balloon that her film "touche[d] on very deep things I thought I'd forgotten," that Abbas Kiarostami had already made a feature-length ode to the power of cinema to touch on recognizable human memories and emotions? And yes, by its beautiful conclusion, Close-Up turns out be nearly as wondrous and inspirational as that Hou film. (This is the last day of its run at New York's Film Forum, but the Criterion Collection is scheduled to release a two-DVD set of the film on June 22. It's very much worth the investment!)
The first gig I ever saw was by the way a Björk one, when she was playing with the Sugarcubes in Ghent. I was fifteen and during the encores I actually jumped on stage. Einar (the other vocalist in the band, bs) even took a picture of Björk and I.
Anyway, once I was in the BMW Lane and posing along at 110 mph
And who is to say that is a bad collection of people?
For years to come, though, in his dreams the boy will see their wild fringed eyes and feel the deep thudding of their hooves. I guess very few children nowadays know the experience of feeling the ground thudding as a horse gallops by at a short distance, but I have to say I was taken aback when, in two of the classes I read this to, a boy put up his hand at the end and asked in a troubled voice if someone died. Yes, there is the concept of death in the ending, but it's an emotional death: because of the emotional repression, the relationship between the father and son is doomed and they'll never be close. But the boy, still longing for that closeness, will dream in the future of the ponies they ignored that day (and which moved around the tent in the night and then galloped off again), and which, with their wildness and softness and freedom, symbolised the unexpressed and unfulfilled emotions.
I place it against my shoulder and smile to myself. I look in the mirror and see the silver touch my pale skin. This time, there's no hesitation. This time, I push it in and draw it down, ever so slowly, wincing as I form a thin red line to go with the three pink scars already there. I smile to myself as the pain which is becoming increasingly familiar takes over my thoughts. For a few moments, I know that I'll forget about being Bingirl, Princess Pizza Face, or any of the other names people call me. The pain will be all I can focus on, and I will be happier than I've been all day.
our proud
different departments getting out into the Norwegian countryside. I'm
After tasting wine at Domaine Valdition (more about that in a future post), we were headed with our friends to dine at Sous Les Micocouliers Restaurant in Eygalières. This restaurant has been selected by the Michelin inspectors as "Les Meilleures Adresses à Petit Prix", meaning you can eat well for a good price, something I like to do.
"What do you need help with?" Rachel asked, trying to be sincere. But failing. She knew where this would lead.
If you donate twice during the contest (this means you have to donate like TOMORROW to be able to donate again in the timeframe), then your name will be entered twice into the contest.
What makes this so desperately sad is that even the slightest knowledge of the history of the area would confirm that the project was never going to achieve its desired aim, even if it had been technically successful.
” No lah! Can’t be, “ he said.
2. Understand the plan of salvation
I had much the same problem in Aspen, compounded by trying to keep up with Dana and Bonny, my two fitter sisters-in-law, and the high altitude which made me huff and puff even more than usual.
"In the end, the secret to learning is so simple: Think only about whatever you love. Follow it, do it, dream about it...and it will hit you: learning was there all the time, happening by itself."
Vaagai Sooda Vaa
I finished it off with some buttons from my stash and called it done.
I know, I'm a bitch. But I'm really not okay with all the touching of food that I might consider buying... That's just me. You like dirty food, then I'm okay with that, I don't judge people. Just don't make me eat it too.
Friday - Lemon Chicken, yellow rice, green beans
He added that the AU had also recently reaffirmed its stance on the lowland gorillas of central Africa, and had agreed that the animals needed to be moved to a place of safety such as a Las Vegas zoo "which could be arranged for a small cash payment to the AU".
Prime Minister David Cameron said the killing was “shocking and merciless”.
Living with her most amazing 10 year old daughter in South East Michigan, Francette has found her home. Home had always seemed elusive until the birth of her only child. The baby arrived with a gift: the key needed to free what was in her mother's heart. Through her daughter, Francette discovered she could be at home in her own skin. She very much wants to be a "full time" stay at home mom, but current circumstances require that she enjoy being an on-campus and online instructor/facilitator at the local University and College. Although Francette works as an academic, she and her daughter have only known the free and happy lives of unschoolers.
The past few weeks, we have had several children out with colds and flus. We hare happy to see the speedy recovery of most of the children, but these weeks are a definite reminder of how fast germs can travel at school and at home. Thank you for being so conscientious with preventing the spread of germs on your end. With your help, hopefully, this will be a mild cold and flu season.
The second thing the Lord began to show me was how I must come out and be separate. 2 Corinthians 6:17 (KJV): “Therefore “Come out from among them. And be separate, says the Lord.Do not touch what is unclean, And I will receive you.” I knew for sure that people would REALLY think that I thought that I was better than them if I told them that verse. The only thing that brought me comfort during that time is the fact that the Lord assured me that if anything, me coming away from old friends and ultimately old sins, has potential of pricking the hearts of sinners, convicting them until they too want to seek salvation. Even after knowing that I tried to plead with God, begging Him to allow me to hang around old friends since I no longer desire to indulge in old sins. You know the response I got? 1 Corinthians 15:33 (KJV): “Be not deceived: evil communications corrupt good manners.” Even after reading this I tried to hang out, trying to dwell among sinners while still a weak babe in Christ myself. Of course sometimes God will use us to minister to sinners but God had to break all ties before He could use me in that way. Going out to get dinner started off as just spending time with old friends (although I decided to live life differently), and ended up bringing me closer to relapsing in sin. Hearing curse words, being in the midst of lustful conversations, and smelling the scent of alcohol and marijuana was too much for me to handle as it began to make me numb to sin. The decision I had to make was if I would keep these friends and lose God or keep God and lose old friends. I chose to keep God and lose old friends. Proverbs 13:20 (KJV): “He that walketh with wise men shall be wise: but a companion of fools shall be destroyed.”
I couldn’t stop thinking about this situation and the ‘what-if’s', I couldn’t focus on any one thing before my mind would go back to this situation. I stopped everything I was doing, grabbed my journal and started writing.
Don’t try to get results like ours on a standard search engine; you’ll be bombarded with forums, news, articles, and competitors. Don’t be fooled into thinking you are searching every market out there by directory sites…all you are “searching” with them are their own advertiser’s sites. While we do have advertising on our site, the raw results are all-inclusive and unbiased.
See you on the 14th!!
3. Fastest Growing Heartache In The West
“No, 6. Good try though.”
I called my brother, who listened to the police reports. Nothing, he said. Either they've got it offline now or they've switched to a private channel, he said. Which would've made sense, except it wasn't the case. I can say with mostly certainty that the things not easily defined are the things I find most valuable.
Saying that internet is the future of entertainment, popular Bollywood singer Sonu Nigam has entered into a partnership with media and software company Cinsay to bring the star closer to his fans and consumers in the United States.
The string quilt is based on the one named Valentine from The Practical Guide to Patchwork by Elizabeth Hartman. I decided to use more colors and make my quilt a little smaller than what the instructions call for, so I needed to draw my own layout. I need to make 30 blocks, I have 9 so far, clearly I have a long way to go.
3-4 pound venison backstrap
* Finally, where your property is marked is important, especially if engraving or punching. The chances are you'll want to keep the mark out of site, so try marking underneath or around the back of the item. The most important thing to remember is to choose a surface that can't be removed without spoiling the basic appearance or performance of the item. If thieves can't remove your mark without breaking your property, then it's worthless and they probably won't want it.
However, I am very familiar with Traci’s seizure triggers, having witnessed numerous seizures over the years we were together, and seen many more occasions when she had what she called the “heebie-jeebies” – myoclonic jerks, to use the medical term – and quieted herself in order to prevent a seizure from occurring. Due to that familiarity, I have an understanding of what led to Traci’s fatal seizure. Having reconstructed what actually occurred, I can also imagine an alternative scenario in which Traci, with full conscious awareness not only of her own seizure triggers but also of her relatively high risk of SUDEP, makes different choices on that particular day, and lives.
It's non-sticky, absorbs quickly, smells nice (the fragrance is light), and has nice protection. I love that I can use it on face and/or body - as well as use it on myself, my husband and my son.
Your teachings have been so helpful through this difficult period.
Forgive me for my erratic posting schedule this week—I’ve had a lot of non-writing related issues to tend to and the days have been getting away on me!
7. What other types of art are you into?
Stupid, red skinned, foolish, disrespect to Native Americans….nobody said, “That’s an honorable Native Chief”….
Cartographers in business,
If it were as simple as having the right tone then racism would have died out ages ago.
What's it like to be the most beautiful girl in the world?
One of our favorite outings was to walk over the Brooklyn Bridge and hit the DUMBO flea market. Brooklyn Flea, now has multiple locations, based on season and is no longer under the bridge. We have scored many a hot item there, not to mention some highly collectible art pieces, for a song. The Sloan Kettering Thrift Shop, on the Upper East Side, is a consistent source for prints and excellent quality vintage couture clothing and accessories. I have added several Kipp's views to my collection, nicely framed for under $300.00 each.
- Maybelline eye, Instant Age Rewind makeup: 15% off
Eating still is not happening. Part of the tonsil removal is hoping it will help with swallowing and speech. We will see if his eating improves in the next couple of months. He is still 100 percent tube fed. Although he tastes foods and puts some food in his mouth he does not consume enough to count as any calorie intake. He gags on swallowing the smallest bite.
Past Tense
Thanks for looking and I will be back later with my Digi Doodle Shop DT card.
Please see the buyer reviews & ratings of Electronic Shift Improver Kit for 2005-2010 Dodge Charger, Magnum, Challenger and Chrysler 300/300C Vehicles at the merchant’s site by click on the link below.
I still have good feelings about this re-imagining of ‘The Withered Rose’. It feels like I’m going in the right direction. I’m starting to settle in to writing in Veronica’s voice. This chapter was difficult because I’ve never given birth. I wrote it based on what I’ve read about it or heard from other people. Some of it is based on what my mother’s told me about my birth.
How did you do?
In December 2006, Mr. Rodriguez filed a claim with the Department of Veterans Affairs, arguing that he deserved a monthly disability check and priority mental health care from the agency because of post-traumatic stress disorder. More than five years later, he is still waiting for a final determination on his case.
Another reason is by speaking in code, the information remains cryptic to outsiders.
This article is for those who wish to do the opposite, those who love the emotional connection of a relationship, the adventures, the ups and downs, and the ultimate joy of sharing your life with someone, but don’t want the annoying inconvenience of having to put out.
Make the filling: Heat 3 tablespoons of oil in a large high-sided skillet over medium heat. Cook onions, stirring occasionally, until caramelized, about 25 minutes. Add garlic, and cook until fragrant, about 3 minutes. Let cool. Toss onion mixture, whole tomatoes and red-pepper flakes with 1 teaspoon salt and some pepper. I also threw in fresh thyme here.
Sometimes it is hard to live with these two wolves inside me for both of them try to dominate my spirit. This same fight is going on inside you and inside every other person too.
IT. JUST. HAPPENS.
ISBN: 978-0736927321
But the joy I felt that night has been surpassed by one thing: seeing loved ones receive the same life-changing experience. When I received the Spirit, I did not know what it would mean for my life. When my loved ones received the Spirit, I did know what it would mean for theirs. Understanding its significance intensified the joy.
worlds can be saved
Design Thoughts: It would be tough to thread the baker's twine through the fold in the card (not impossible, just tough), so I took a rectangle of kraft and wrapped it like the inspiration package and popped it up on a kraft card base. Instead of using an image on the oval as the packaging does, I added a sentiment, which allows me to give a distinct purpose and focus to the card.
A fantastic festival and one I have attended each year since 2003. A great way to induct yourslef into the festival scene or if you want to take your family along. The Kid Zone comes highly recommended by my daughter!
The boy had now wrapped his arms and legs around the Croton tree –
I raise an ironic eyebrow and go back to sleep.
To take the lion
She lives in spirit and teaches through a higher power. Connected intuitively through the universe and angelic realms.
3) let me actually use Photoshop. That used to overload my computer, so I was always hesitate to actually draw anything. Maybe I can start posting art & stories at the same time. I’ll try!
They were expected to appear in the Pretoria Magistrate's Court on Tuesday.
My interest, as someone observing the global gaming market, is in its long-term valuation, not the stock volatility expected on May 17th, and an antecedent speculative bubble. However, I can’t help but feel that the hype surrounding the IPO has become a de facto part of the Zynga valuation. Which leads me to question the extent to which the Facebook offering will have an effect.
Hampe said he was treated at a hospital, while Michael Hankin, 25, of Hawaii also was injured and treated at the scene.
If Kamla backs down and gives Prakash what he wants, the COP may win a political battle, but for me, the mere fact that this is what finally galvanised Ramadhar into action shows me precisely where his mind is at…on the money…the ministerial positions…the power.
To me it was bizarre, but to other’s it was just a regular Sunday in the world of a Daschund owner. I guess at the end of the day, a dog essentially like a child…no matter how ‘special looking’ it is – if it is your own, you love it & think it is the best!
His heart stopped beating naturally for 78 minutes after he collapsed during Bolton’s FA Cup quarter-final at Tottenham on March 17 but was fit enough to walk out of hospital just a month after the ordeal.
We are open to any and all suggestions. Please share your thoughts and experiences. Know of a place where we may be able to find silk High and Magic Roses? Do tell.
On March 7, 2012, U.N. Secretary General Ban Ki-moon delivered a historic speech at the United Nations Human Rights Council in Geneva, asking countries around the world to decriminalize same-sex relationships and end discrimination against LGBT people. The speech itself attracted some coverage, but what dominated the news that day was the response by the audience: in a major breach of diplomatic protocol, several members of the council, in an obviously prearranged move, staged a coordinated walkout before the speech even began.
“I admit that under the current circumstances it has not come as a major surprise to me. I was brought in by Craig Whyte but because his control and reputation has been damaged by recent disclosures, I feel my own position has been undermined by association.
You will go home with 6 cupcakes 8 cake pops and skills to last a lifetime. The skills you learn in this class can be used to bake delicious and beautiful sweets for friends and family. This class is suitable for all skill levels and perfect for beginner bakers.
Over the next few weeks I'd see Carma periodically and wear different costumes while she took pictures and told stories. She'd call painters and leave messages saying things like "I found a new model and you'd be a fool not to use him" and then she'd send them pictures of me. One day, she handed me her keys and got into the passenger side of her car while explaining to me that she'd been feeling light-headed, so I should drive us down to the LDS Motion Picture Studio, where she'd show me off to the Casting Director, who would be a fool not to use me. Not knowing quite how to disobey anyone with Carma's dizzying energy, I drove ahead, even past authorized personnel only signs, until we were stopped at the security gate, where some poor young man had to spend several minutes explaining to Carma that she couldn't simply drive in without authorization and an appointment.
A few for instances: there are tinges of Harry Potter in Occult Academy and Blue Exorcist. True Blood, while a good show, would be far scarier and less goofy if it followed Shiki’s storyline rather than Charlene Harris’s books. I was so turned off by the Marvel-backed Heroman (Bones) and Iron Man (Madhouse) anime, I didn’t even bother with Wolverine (which some may say was a mistake, but I still don’t really regret skipping it).
Until Blossom."
For more:
“Debbie, if you died would Justin still live with us” I thought for a moment and replied “well actually, if I died, Justin would go live with his dad.” There was a very brief pause when another one of the bonus kids chimed in with “What if both you and Justin’s dad died? Then would he live with us?” Now this got me thinking. I truthfully told them that at the moment there was some very old paperwork in place stating that if Justin’s dad and I both died, Justin would go live with one of my coworkers and her family. But I did tell them that Justin’s dad and I were rarely ever in the same place at the same time and the chances of us both dying at the same time were very slim. This was followed up with the youngest one asking, “If our dad died, would we still live with you?” I told them that No, if their dad died, they would live with their mom, but they could still see me whenever they wanted. And I should have seen it coming, but the very next question was “What if mom and dad both died, then would we live with you?” Again, I tried to make clear the idea that the chances of both of their parents dying at the same time were virtually zero. But the middle child not to be dissuaded went with “What if dad got cancer and mom died in a car accident at the same time, then would we live with you?” I was stumped. I finally went with, “Great question. I’ll have to talk to your dad about that.” Definitely more bizarre dinner conversation than I am used to, but things got even more interesting a few nights later.
Our budget is tight for this project so we have decided to remove the carpet and put down a new 5/8" T & G plywood sub floor and stain it ourselves. Today I will go out in search of the perfect colour stain. (Funny, my husband suggested the colour I stained the stairs might be nice! I think he likes the stairs!!! No, the stairs are not done yet...did I mention I pulled all the tendons in my right arm? Did I mention that I am right handed? More on that later!)
I had asked Harby, "Are we fucked?"
Bad news, then, for Utusan Malaysia, as it continues on its rampage as the bad boy of journalism for its actions against Hata Wahari — not to mention what Awang Selamat does.
But universe rights? You want to stop film-makers currently outside the Milky Way from adapting this material, in case the end result causes problems for you? How far to the next galaxy? In the producers’ interests, I’m prepared to work to as narrow a definition as possible, ie, Milky Way satellite galaxies are not included in Milky Way (ie, galaxy) rights. So, the nearest galaxy outside our own is Canis Major Dwarf. How near? 25,000 light years.
Baby, I'm from New York
Yes. I yanked it back pretty damn quick.
And last but not least, the Japanese are obsessed with all things French! Boulangeries, patisseries, brocantes, chez this and chez that. The Japanese love the French!
The above preparation was made in Lalgudi with homegrown mangoes.
Sabine Kranzelbinder plays the elf Isabella in “Grimm’s Snow White” http://wp.me/p2eH5w-1B who reluctantly works for the evil Queen, but escapes and redeems herself. Sabine is an amazing actress that has been in many plays and for the last several years has been offering German and English theatre workshops for children, youths, and adults all while raising her four and a half year old son. I’m impressed! I thank Sabine for sharing her experience while filming “Grimm’s Snow White” and about herself in general.
I went to a somewhat idyllic primary school with small class sizes, where everyone just seemed to get along. Yes, we were all young, but that doesn't change the fact that bullying can happen at any given age. In my class, there were boys who were sporty, and boys who were more nerdy. There were girls who were tomboys, and girls who were girly. I belonged to the latter group, though was surprisingly invited to birthday parties of girls in the former group. There was teasing going on, but the kids seemed to know when they were overstepping the mark. I was happy there - to the point that I complained being at home whenever I was sick. These days, I know that my happiness was all due to the work of our class teacher. She had the ability to bring everyone together, to discipline us kids with words when we needed to, as well as being a source of solace in times when we needed support. You know a teacher was good when even decades later, you think of her with fondness. She was one of those.
This story was all about a psychic connection but can anyone really predict the future. Read Mind Over Matter by Nora Roberts to find out.
Equity
MaryBeth and her husband, John, have a beautiful home on Hull Bay with views of downtown Boston. The two have worked meticulously to create a warm and inviting environment. We arrived in the late afternoon for an overnight stay. MaryBeth settled us into what they call The Nautilus Room. Comfy luxury enveloped us. The room was perfectly appointed with views of the bay. Sail away, sail away, sail away!
Author appearances/writing conferences: 5
Glue red circle to middle of paper. Trace over lines with black crayon to divide the circle into 6 equal parts. Write the following fractions in order on the red circle: 1/6, 2/6, 3/6, 4/6, 5/6, 6/6
he prepared himself for dinner
The moments where I get to wear a heel are few and far between. I just bought these moccasins, and I love them. I think they are a great transitional shoe before busting out the sandals.
Beside outright killings, rapes and sexual mutilations of Hutu women were systematically carried out as a form of punishment for their ethnic group’s perpetration of genocide in Rwanda. And since then, northeastern Congo has become the epicenter of this scourge where it has festered among roving armed bands, penetrated the anthropological fabric of the Congolese society, and results today in the near psychological and physical destruction of rape victims from that part of the country. A sociohistorical antecedent that still has to find a definition and a body of scholarship in social sciences. The most shocking thing about this is that the ongoing sexual terrorism in the Congo has caused scant media attention in Africa and in the rest of the world. A situation that has since been remedied with the release last year of Lisa Jackson’s award-winning documentary The Greatest Silence: Rape in the Congo.
We grieve and we weep our Father God,
And from that moment of Mediterranean Jewish history – of past, present and future bound up in one space – two weeks later I found myself in New York, and on our first night here we (my travelling buddy and I) saw one of (post)modernity’s great Jewish thinkers – Judith Butler – with Angela Davis and Lena Meari, and with some short clips from documentaries by Mai Masri – talking on the topic of “Carceral Politics in Palestine and Beyond: Gender, Vulnerability, Prison”. A point that each of them made in such brilliant fashion was that the Occupation of Palestine and Palestinians is fundamentally constructed by and through carceral politics. What is meant by ‘carceral politics’? Basically, it’s the politics of incarceration. So, in the fact that the threat of incarceration by the Israeli State is a constant threat, and one which is constantly carried out against large segments of the Palestinian population: if you want to subdue a population, you keep them under constant threat of harassment, imprisonment, maltreatment, separation from family and friends. But it’s not just that the possibility of incarceration is ever-present (although that is fundamental to the project) but also that the length of time that one will spend incarcerated is potentially unknown, potentially unending. This is the regime of Administrative Detention. So everyone has a family member, or a close friend, who has been incarcerated under this regime. It’s literally ever-present, in a temporal and a spatial sense.
Seth re-entered the financial industry today as an Asst. Branch Mgr for a credit union. He had a great day. I didn't start counting down hours until 2pm, so that's not too bad right? I hate wishing time away, so hopefully God will do a work in me that makes this a bit easier. I was able to have dinner ready, bathed two kids, did 3 loads of laundry, vacuumed, cleaned out my refrigerator and took care of and played with 6 children. It really was a productive day. The hard part was missing my hubby. Owen walked around all day looking for "Da da." And bedtime came really soon, he hardly had time to say hi to all the kids, much less spend time with them. There is a season for everything though, which is what I keep reminding myself. The Lord uses every circumstance to draw us closer to Him and I did do A LOT of praying today. ha ha
I have been wondering what the Word of God is and means. I have been seeking the Lord’s enlightenment so that I may have some understanding of His Word. I think that I have received some understanding.
Looking back, 2010 was a horrendous year for me personally. I received numerous death threats, had my bike damaged and wheels slashed on a number of occasions. I was physically attacked in the streets when wearing my suit, had liquids thrown over me and was punched in the face. No police action was taken, even though I reported each incident. And then there was that altercation with Billy Bragg where at least I managed to get him to concede that Labour wasn’t representing interests and concerns of the people of Barking and Dagenham. There was certainly never a dull moment!
Either way no matter how carefully I weigh, or portion I always end up with extra.
taken while we enjoyed our coffee.
I have been wanting to change my blog header for some time, but just didn't know where to start. I happened to go to fellow consultant Tresa Black's blog on the weekend and found some great tutorials on doing exactly that. Check them out here!
It is true “kingdom” can have several meanings and connotations, but in each instance you would have to argue for and then present arguments in support of the particular definition you want to go with, in light of you seemingly suggesting the kingdom is partite. Indeed, in Daniel it seems you to want to say the kingdom is the “seat” in heaven but the kingdom in Matthew 25:34 is the “domain” on earth.
These two series are from Drew’s ‘Print Collages’, and ‘Prints of Industry’. He also does etchings, monoprints, woodblock and linocut prints.
What did that mean? Doing nothing usually meant you were not doing worthwhile things- 'worthwhile' of course, meaning what my mother thought was constructive and valuable.
As I believe I have mentioned in a previous article, I went to a very preppy law school. I finished writing my Bar Admission Exams and was called to the Bar the year Metropolitan was released. Many of the movie’s characters reminded me of the preppies with whom I studied.
But wait. Could this be a clue? Also posted on November 1, 2006, by RomanceWriter: Nancy Has Scored Her First Book Sale. "Thank you God! Thank you fans! And special thanks to my literary agent Michele Glance Rooney for helping to motivate me to keep going when the going got tough!" rhapsodizes the surnameless Nancy. "Michele Glance Rooney...may not always tell you what you want to hear, but she will tell you what you need to hear and need to know to get your book published. Michele Glance Rooney is an agent who knows what it takes to sell a romance novel."
Sometimes I do crazy things when I’ve taken too many painkillers, when my head’s a little fuzzy and I’m not 100% sure of what’s going on around me.
I’ve thought about it a bit but I’m not sure many people would buy it LOL. Correct me if I’m wrong! Maybe I should have a t-shirt designing contest. Thoughts?
As for the death part, if things got so bad here that people were taking to the streets, I think it would be legitimate to flee, but it would not be legitimate to raise our fist against the established authorities (Romans 13:1-7). And in this modern world, where countries compete with each other to attract labor and capital, voting with your feet may be a reasonable response.
The recruitment of Steven Uncles into the EDP in 2003 began their journey to where they are now. Political egos were allowed to reign supreme in the National Council of the EDP. Building from the grass-roots was abandoned in favour of political gimmicks and unrealistic goals; money was squandered as if the coffers were bottomless.
I have been bent and broken,
I don’t need steaming hot breakfasts now that the weather is warmer, but I couldn’t face eating these cold out the fridge – it just didn’t do it for me. But slightly warmed and with all those toppings? Yum! Plus the Greek yogurt made for some great protein in the morning.
My white jeans took a real beating on our Mexico trip....they were already getting a little worn...
for the resulting chaos in Regent Street.
This week I had another two really difficult speed sessions that I smashed on the treadmill. The first was a series of 500m sprints, the second a series of 1km sprints. I managed to complete the 4x 1km sprints at a pace of 15km/hr, major struggle, mainly with maintaining form (although I was huffing and puffing and on the verge of vomiting as well). But I did complete both sessions successfully which was a major win for the week.
So, big words coming from a childless woman right? Check back in on me in a few years….we’ll see how my life lessons are panning out. Viva la roller skates!!!
After deciding to do Project 366, I've been doing fairly well. I did miss a few days while I was so sick, but then one of my BFF's sent me some pictures she had taken those days so that I would have a complete set! Thanks, Connie!
The kids all drifted off on the way home from a really nice day Upstate.
So picture this: you are a college football coach and you've dreamed about being a sports commentator for years - you just knew you could do it, but no, you actually had no formal training. But one day, you win a position on NBC, during the playoffs!!! AMAZING!! You are terribly excited, grateful and nervous as hell. You show up first day of your dream job, and you are reminded that yes, your first day of your new job will indeed be on national television.
Now for this month....I will take $5.00 off your order of $50.00 or more if you leave a comment on this blog so that I know it's worth my time doing this each month! ;)
i resolved to be a better pet mommy.
... but seriously!
Stir, then cover and cook on low for 8 hours or high for 6 hours.
The most famous remark Joyce made about the stories can be found in one of the many letters he wrote to Grant Richards when he was trying to get them published in 1906, telling Richards that he had written the stories “in a style of scrupulous meanness and with the conviction that he is a very bold man who dares to alter in the presentment, still more to deform, whatever he has seen and heard.”
Not only does Carrie get her winning song from iTunes (right after she sends me her email), she also gets these six runner-ups. It was originally only going to be four, but the judges decided they were just too good and had to expand the prize.
(And the party planner of course;)
“Who is John and what does he do?”
Yes, when I read The Graveyard book I thought that some bits were a bit like Coraline although I have only seen the film and also I thought the beginning was also like Anthony Horowitz’s “Horowitz Horror.”
My favourite and most reliable cupcake recipe uses the all-in-one method and for 24 cakes I used 300g butter/soft margarine, 300g sugar, 350g self-raising flour, 2 tsp of vanilla extract, or the seeds from 1 vanilla pod and 6 eggs.
And it totally is, which is why I was saying it might have been the record that effectively ended tech death for me. Everything, and I mean EVERYTHING, is so outrageously technical and over-the-top that I am seriously wondering a) how much alien DNA do these guys have? and b) how the fuck do they even remember how to play all this?
April 1, 2012 Sometime in the Afternoon: Conan O’Brien Unveils the Future of Twitter: Manual Tweets
Planning a wedding is a fulltime job. With several events often held back to back – spanning over a week or more – it’s no wonder brides have been known to take months off from their regular jobs just to plan their weddings. When it comes to weddings there are usually more things to do than time to do it in. And while you’re busy checking off the major chunk of must-dos off your list, it’s the little yet oh-so-important must-haves that sometimes slip through the cracks.
Working with Director Tony Schiller
If all of this wasn't enough, my cat Autumn was in the bathroom and at some point decided she was very interested in the ice cubes in the tub. She hopped up on the ledge and hung over like a ragdoll. She stretched her paws as far as they could go and tried desperately to bat at the ice cubes. She was maybe a half inch from the water's surface and could not manage to get any closer. I knew there was a good chance that if she inched forward any further she could fall in--making herself miserable, but even worse, splashing me with the cold water. I could have scooted toward her and given her a nudge off of the edge and back onto the floor, but that would mean moving and I was quite frozen to my spot. I just held my breath and watched her, every now and again I would look away to continue negotiating with the ice. "Really you don't want to come too close to me, I might melt you." My eyes darted back and forth ice cubes, cat, ice cubes, cat, either one could possibly send me screaming at any given moment.
We did come across one problem and that was with the light bulbs. It turns out that they make two different types of light bulb tips (blunt v. bent) and we happened to grab one of each kind. I like the blunt tips better (the the ones furthest from the camera) so I'll try to exchange the bent tip package for a blunt tip package the next time we're at Home Depot.
Conversations at such affairs were always interesting. The number one topic was always rain. There was always a need for more rain. The ranchers depended on rain for the grass that would fatten the cattle that would then be sold. Without rain, there would be no grass, and the ranchers would have to “feed”, which would eliminate any hope of any meaningful profit, or income. So, there was always a need for more rain. In addition to Ranchers, there were also Farmers around, who were keenly interested in rain as well. Unlike Ranchers, who simply always wanted more rain, the Farmers wanted rain, but needed it at the right time and in the right amount. Rain after planting was a good thing, but if it rained too much right before a harvest, the mud would keep the tractors out of the fields, and all would be lost. So sometimes everyone wanted rain, and sometimes disputes would break out between those who wanted rain this week, and those who needed it to stay dry for a few more weeks. I guess the bottom line is that you never had everyone happy at the same time. Suffice it to say that on this particular hot July day, everyone was in agreement. We needed rain.
Nov 6 Albany, NY — Palace Theatre
As you complete the challenge, either leave me a comment or send me an email. If you blog about your creation, send me the link. If you’re not a blogger, feel free to send a picture and/or description and I’ll include it in the final round-up at the end of the month.
“He? Just one?”
1 Peter 5:6-7
The females of this species use a fascinating method to protect their eggs after fertilization. They swallow them. The tadpoles remain and grow in the stomach for the first six weeks after they hatch. How is it possible that they can remain in their mothers’ stomach that long without being digested?
1/2 cup Parsley Leaves
I know now what had been growing in me all that time. What I felt, so suspiciously, in the cavity of my chest. I remember how, even after the show and the residency and all that making, I somehow still felt full and unfinished. I felt like a carton of eggs with only one missing. I remember, too, how I wrestled with that feeling for months. The most awful sense, impending birth of something totally unknown. It was as if the sky was either about to rip apart or come together and I didn't know which or in what direction. The sleeplessness, the dreamlessness, the slow agony.
Police arrested a man they said killed two people at an Orlando apartment complex on Sunday night.
Jay Jay can hardly wait and keeps asking:
Anyway during these absence period, I'm still very much into baking...something which I can't stop totally =) just that I bake lesser these days and bake mostly during weekends.
The Robin's Nest $15.00 Gift Certificate (our March sponsor!):
Plus I was disappointed that my whole team had flaked on me. There were supposed to be 5 of us - and there was only me. Of course I am very proud and very thankful to all my supporters - I had well over $700 in contributions! And I wasn't walking totally alone - I walked with my daughter and her friend.
I don’t have a template of the mask or cape for you, but they were SUPER easy. I just cut a cape template from butcher paper and glued on the “Superhero Synthesis” emblem. I hole punched a couple of holes on either side of the cape and tied a piece of yarn from hole to hole. I found a mask template online and used it as a tracer.
What becomes of a dream that never manifests?
Alright, I’ll quit carrying on about Brice now. Until tomorrow, most likely.
despite there leaves untouched by anothers,
Another first love is my high school boyfriend.I had two serious boyfriends during my school days, both relationships lasting between two and four years. Each relationship, I completely threw my entire being into. Bad. Each relationship left me so completely devastated that I really couldn’t properly handle the emotions. I think this is where my depression started. The first one broke my heart and I let him, over and over. The second one, well, the relationship was rocky, at best, and although he doesn’t really make the list of my first loves, he assisted in giving me the greatest love of my life.
Willie Mabon: Seventh Son
SH hadn't been to Menards in weeks, so he welcomed the chance to make a trip to his mecca, although he is not so keen on them since learning that one of the owners is a complete jerk. Yet he votes with his pocketbook, as do certain "We hate Wal-Mart but we shop there because they force us to because of the low prices but darit, we are FOR working people unless it's inconvenient for us!" others who cannot be named here.
Beginning of the year started, as many do, with promise and goals. I started getting together the book review blog, Reading at Dawn. I discussed my internship a little, though I know a few people are hoping to hear even more about that part.
Of course, that was a while ago, and it doesn't look nearly so tidy anymore. I am a messy crafter. When I work, I like to spread everything out, and right now my crafting table is covered in scraps of paper, bits of fabric, and a few half-finished projects.
That induces this rough text
There, the guys mostly talked in Fulfulde and occasionally asked me a few questions in English about Obama and American education/culture. Sulemanu told me that when a baby is born, if the family is wealthy enough, they slaughter a cow. We ate bread and dipped it into a beef broth made from the cow. When the broth ran low, we used forks to eat chunks of beef left over in the bowl. This was the first time since I’ve been here that I had to remember to always eat with my right hand. The man is a Christian church-goer in Wouram but comes from a Muslim background so I didn’t want to do anything impolite. We also ate avocados. There were two avocados that were cut into quarters and we used spoons to scoop the fruit out. We drank hot tea with sugar at first and then cold milk. They said the milk was from a cow so I imagine that it was genuine milk, not the milk we typically have which is water mixed with dried milk powder.
d. A meme of a cat encased in armor made out of bacon
So Braska and I are hanging out, playing a little, trying to nap… ah yes, trying to nap. I would love to get caught up on the house or something, but I still don’t feel very well and I’ve got no energy at all.
“We envision a world in which young people feel safe from bullying and we’re thrilled to partner with the STOMP Out Bullying™ organization. We share their commitment to help people take a stand against bullying in schools and communities,” says Fabian Tenenbaum, CEO of Syneron Beauty, the maker of Tanda branded products. ”Tanda Zap offers ground-breaking acne clearing technology to help teens feel comfortable and secure in their own skin and we hope that this initiative will raise awareness and dialogue around this issue and that ultimately it will serve to help foster greater understanding and mutual respect among teens.”
The other reason I mention this is that there's a super cool documentary about these boys and their world called American Artifact, the Rise of American Rock Poster Art, where you can see clips and interviews and stories with these artists. There's going to be two screenings and Q&As at the Roxie Theatre at the end of the month, so if you find this interesting, you should go.
Yes. We planned to commute.
I just can’t be with no one else
Brian concludes:
This morning I woke up, and looked around my bedroom and realized there are papers, books, magazines, and reciepts from clothes everywhere. I have been meaning to get around to cleaning the papers and what not up, but I've just been avoiding it...until today when I looked outside and saw the rain coming down! Gotta love Canada!
*Judy Moody Girl Detective
That's just Disgusting!
The faces of some of our prized multicultural benefactors and what they have to say…
Uptown opens with another (yawn) jazz ode to Manhattan which is made more curious by the fact that David Basse is the acknowledged “leader” of the Kansas City jazz scene. In fact, two of the first three tracks are New York-centric which would be a little bit tedious even by a New York based jazz singer. And a mention of stepping out in a top hat, really, in 2012?
Kamisama Mou Sukoshi
now hiring lunch workers for the school
Also, since that’s how I look stumblin out of bars most nights, I can pretty well imagine how cute those would be on my feet.
You really want to consider the size of the forum as well. The bigger the forum, the less likely that you will find any *friends* there, also there will probably not be much real information. Under 100 members and there won't be a lot, either.(Under 50 members...why don't ya just meet in a chat room?)
Cat House on the Kings. According to their website, they’re a no-kill, lifetime sanctuary for stray and abandoned cats, located out in California. If your readers wish, they can learn a little more about them at their website: http://www.cathouseonthekings.com/
Urban Decay 24/7 eyeliner in Zero – upper lashline, outer lower lashline
But so often the broken-hearted and the lost think there is no way God could ever love them. They ask God, “Do you know who I am? Have you seen the things I’ve done?” I know I did. I was pretty sure at one point that there was no way anyone could ever love me if they knew who I was and all the things I’d done, especially not someone like the God of the Universe.
Well, meatloaf was the very first dish that I ever made on my own. My Mom taught it to me and carefully drilled me in how to make it because I took a trip down to my Godmother’s house. I remember being so proud that I was able to cook it and get it on the table all by myself! That gives it a special place in my heart as a family food as well as a comfort food and therefore delightfully fits into the blog! Please enjoy. Oh, and I’m sorry the picture is rotten. It was late and we just wanted to eat so I didn’t try to get a glamor shot!
:: Rum Punch
If you don't see that, then you haven't looked far enough downstream.
Of selfishness.
Their team searches to find the cutest, most comfortable, and highest quality clothes and accessories available. If you are looking for something that they don't provide, let them know and they will find it for your and add it to their wide selection of designer clothes.
2T. oil
It makes me think of Legend more than anything and Legend makes me think of Mia Sara, who, for just a minute there, had very high Geek Babe status. Seriously, her first two movies EVER were Legend and Ferris Bueller’s Day Off. Ever. How could her career ever live up to that start? Well, okay, Legend isn’t exactly an all-timer, but can you say you were in a Ridley Scott movie right at the start of your acting career? And then followed it up with a movie that stars Charlie Sheen and pre-nose job Jennifer Grey?
Tom: Another super hero movie? Avengers, hmm. Sketchers ad, love that high jumpin' doggie. Brady continues to move the chains. Time out.
Oleh karena itu, suatu “bangsa” harus memenuhi persyaratan paling tidak sebagai berikut :
With sincere apologies to Miss Judith, I am not disciplined enough to do it the right way.
Basically the novel was a watered-down Catherine Millet. Sex for respectable readers, if you like. And because of it, the book sold hundreds of thousands of copies. It also spawned a whole new genre. Whose name I won't reveal here. (Just think of the nickname for knee-high boots and then insert 'books' where the word 'boots' should go.)
We are counseled to not be a sign seeking people, as this story is of seeking a sign...but I think there is wisdom in remembering that our Father is a God of miracles.
astral minstrels cry
Not much else in terms of structures or mechanical parts were evident at the launch. Lowe did confirm to me that the Mercedes AMG KERS remained packaged under the fuel tank in one assembly. Also adding that there would not be an significant weight loss to the system. As a significant reduction in weight was made between the 2009 and 2011 season, via the consolidation of the Batteries and Power Electronics into one unit.
I did like the large navy blue DKNY monogram totes, but the practical side of me won out when faced with such a large bag and only one small zipped pocket inside. I like compartments.
I am the author of a fantasy romance trilogy, Kingdom of Arnhem - Woman of Honor (2009), Knight of Glory (2010), and Champion of Valor (2011) published with Desert Breeze Publishing. Fifteen of my short works have appeared in various anthologies, including Mertales by Wyvern Publications, and many collections by Pill Hill Press.
The best thing about this recipe is you can make it all the night before (or morning before you go to work) and then just toss it in the oven when you are ready for dinner, which is what I usually do. I also usually add extra cheese into the soup mixture as I LOVE cheese! I hope that you enjoy, this, and if you are a "copy and paste" type person, just look below for the entirety of the recipe.
I was going to do another catch-up with the 365 Days Journey Through the Past today. I am obsessed right now with New Orleans so I haven’t been as diligent with the Journey. However, when I looked at the photo for day 175, I knew it needed its own dedicated post. Graduating with a master’s degree was a major milestone in my life and I still love my final project, an art installation using digital technology. I have the door hanging over my couch, for heaven’s sake!
Blog Sponsorships:
I like to think that the Teich Archive has an additional element that sets it apart from these other postcard collections and gives it a unique visual voice. Upstairs in the Teich Archives dozens of metal file cabinets stand like upright treasure chests holding little gems of the past. Over 100,000 art files used by the Teich artists to create postcards from 1925 through the mid-1950s are housed in these cabinets. Some files are empty, but others may contain tiny watercolor sketches of the final postcard created by the artists for the customer’s approval, original packaging, carpet samples, wallpaper and dozens of other artifacts from the last century. I‘ve seen a sample package of Dr. Witzel’s Cigarettes for Asthmatics, Art Deco inspired carpet pieces, a snapshot of Thomas Edison that someone had thumbtacked to a wall, and real peacock feathers in those files. More importantly these elements of twentieth century life, this odd little collection of visual snippets or perhaps the only remaining photos of buildings that have been demolished for decades, exist nowhere else. Because the contents of these files have yet to be cataloged, there is always an element of anticipation when you pull one from the cabinet.
This winter we witness homes bobbing down raging rivers and sliding off hillsides, while other parts of this planet are buried deep beneath record-breaking snowfalls. Other locations are experiencing the worst droughts in years. Notice the trickle down effect?
The doctor delivered my baby via C-section and he was expert and wonderful and my daughter was healthy and beautiful and safe. When I returned for my check-up weeks later, they told me that my midwife’s breast cancer had returned and she was starting treatments again.
If you are inclined to make a donation could I make a plea on behalf of the RDA.....
It glowed with lighted candles, right at the top a lighted star,
Aside from not enjoying the women dancing naked (I like tank-tops - but these didn't have tank-tops on) I got a terrific kick out of seeing one of the judges, Lilia Estefan, who highly resembled Jane Lynch. Mind you it took me a good hour to think of Miss Lynch's name while trying to explain to my girlfriend who this woman looked like. I guess my latino and american brains are completely separate. Anyway, terrific fun. So let me know if you agree at all.
I'm going to NYC next week so I'll hopefully remember to take photos and blog while I'm there. Expect a visit to Fluevog on Mulberry Street!
Using a whisk, combine the lime juice, milk and sour cream for acouple minutes and is another step our six year old did. Pour into crust.
3) Al fresco drinkers are the public face of strong beer.
- I don’t like when people don’t trust me, because if I say I’ll do something I’ll keep my promise, and If I don’t it probably has to do with something that came between that I didn’t know about. Like when you’ve promised to call someone, but got the wrong number.
Next time you’re at the shop, make sure to read the label of the tahini and purchase the type that is made from unhulled sesame seeds. Sometimes this sort of tahini will be sold under the name “sesame butter” indicating that is in fact different from regular tahini. But again, check the label to be certain – some sesame butters may also use hulled sesame seeds.
Dark wet fall weekends are perfect for family home life. We cozy up, bake, make, read, play, and spend time together. Science is big in our house - there is always something on the to-do list, and there is always a basket filled with something or other we want to play around with. Sometimes we do bigger projects - program a robot, make a solar oven, look through the microscope for specific somethings, test water or soil, see what happens. But sometimes the small projects are really fun too. And they are fun to repeat and even if simple they never quiet get boring (at least with my boys).
Stitched over 2 on 32 ct. Picture It Plus fabric in Gothic
Palmer, who also believes London seems like a great place to spend “illicit loot,” adds, “There’s a prestige about being able to bring your assets and your wealth into the UK.”
We love you all, miss you greatly, and hope to see/talk/skype you all soon.
Scott Baio
As a small girl, I got to know about make-up quite early. We girls used to be dolled up a lot by our parents and the teachers, especially when we had performances at school or in groups of a district where we lived. However, we were not encouraged to use any kind of make-up whatsoever. I used to hear a lot of stories in which people suffered badly from using make-up products. If I were to wear any make-up at all to school, I would expect to receive lots of stares and teases and badmouths about me trying to get attention and/or trying to be unnecessary pretty. My mother herself doesn’t wear make-up. I think it can be because of numerous reasons. One of them can be because she didn’t want me to spend money on things that were not suitable for my age, plus I didn’t have good background information to determine which products were good for me if I based my judgement purely on advertisements on TV. (She actually asked me to do the make-up for her in my sister’s weddings in France and Vietnam, so I guess she thinks it’s now time for me to know this kind of stuffs : D). It was quite weird because the appearance of a person was paid extremely high attention in Vietnam. In fact, when I came to Finland 4 years ago, I found myself surprisingly at ease when nobody seemed to care how dark my skin was, how skinny I was, and so on.
If you are level 85 then you can solo this all you have to do is kill Ymiron on normal or heroic in Utgarde Pinnacle with your orphan out. If you are at lower levels get some friends together or use the dungeon finder.
If you're consciously trying to cut your sugar intake, you could probably cut the sugar back to half a cup as this is pretty sweet. The graham crackers and coconut both add sweetness in addition to the sugar. I will probably try less sugar then next time around.
I was born in the U.S.A.
Greetings Friends,
I wasn't thinking of the apology as I gave it...........
Power in this personality type can be manifested in many different ways, physical power,( strength in males can win respect, as beauty in females can win admiration or respect),status power or intellectual power are just some examples.
The OER Knowledge Cloud has been established to identify, collect, preserve and disseminate available documents of enduring value to researchers, industry, government, scholars, writers, historians, journalists and informal learners
PJ Appleby jumped from his seat towards the screen. “Emma! Allen!”
Most people wipe down the equipment after they're finished. I do that. But I also wipe it down before I start, just in case the person before me forgot. Then I set the seat height to 12, throw my leg up and over, then bounce a few times to get used to the seat. A click on 'quick start', a push of the up arrow to level three, and I start pumping. Ear plugs are inserted, a playlist selected. Then it's time to go.
"No. And I wouldn't want him to be," Meg said defensively.
At the death of Richie Rossiter, a musician who used to be famous, his partner Chrissie is horrified to find that he has left his piano and a substantial part of his assets to his first family–Margaret, his first wife, and his son Scott.
Installing VERITAS File System Documentation as
The houses will be made in pre-fabricated, or ‘prefab’, format, under which the company will provide a kit consisting of roofs, doors, windows, etc, which can be erected or assembled.
Gary gave a blank look and shook his head. Camille began laughing. She walked over to Jake and whispered in his left ear.
His practical joke fucked with all three. He is now on that list. And right now his car is in my garage. No additional details needed.
The big grey rat ran to the end of the wall, wheeled around, and came back to the place where the little beetle was slowly crawling along at only a tiny distance from where the rat had left her.
4.run with the pack
5. How will a Mrs. Bissessar led UNC government deal with the economy due to the continued low prices for gas? What measure do you have for improving the utilization oil and gas revenues? Do you have any strategies for diversifying the economy?
You’ve always been there
I can't wait to read more from this author, and I would highly recommend the Fairy Circle series to EVERYONE!
-$1/1 mq
Akos Szilagyi
Could also be that music has a much stronger and longer-lasting indie tradition than other entertainment industries. The DIY culture is strong in music making so it isn’t a surprise it is also strong in music app making.
She was sent to rescue me,
- GPS satellite links quickly. I think I’ve had trouble with it once or twice, but it usually finds a satellite within 1-2 minutes.
A man's cupping his hand to scoop water from a Highland burn.
Dear Toby/Little Man/Porkchop/Toby Jack/Baby/Furball/Fluffy Face/Buddy/Cutie Face/Tobis/Tobes/Tbird,
It's Zommmmmmmm.....gotcha!!!
And then some quotes that struck me...
HINA ASHFAQ
2) Remove from the heat and place on the mixer. Whisk on medium speed, add in cream of Tartar and whisk until meringue is stiff, and the mixing bowl is cool to the touch. The meringue should look shiny and sticky.
“I am your real mother, I am your more important mother.”
The grav-tanks are then waiting for the end of the game, so they can contest objectives, or block off parts of the table with a skimmer wall to protect my jetbikes depending on the mission. Of course while they are getting ready for this run, my jetbikes and vypers must have demeched my opponent.
Testify!
so round and rigid
out of you will come for me
At that time in the country of Chief Mangwende of vaNhohwe they were troubled by a group of maZwangendaba who were killing many people. They took women, cattle, sheep and goats. Mangwencle was troubled very much and he sent men to Chief Chinamora to ask for help to fight against maZwangendaba. Chinamora agreed and he sent men among whom were Chingoma, Samukange, Mazuru, Nyava, Gutu, Gwindi, Mafusire, Madzima and Chikaka. When they arrived at Mangwende’s home Mhotani, he explained to the people of vaShawasha saying, ‘In this country we are in trouble, because all our country is starving and many people are dying from smallpox. Many people are being killed by the maZwangendaba and some have been captured. Even my own sons, Katerere and Mukarakate have been captured and other people too have been taken to Nyasaland by maZwangendaba.” When the vaShawasha heard this story they asked where the maZwangendaba were,
I was torn when beginning “Tuesdays with Morrie.” It’s been on my radar for years as a popular book, but I’d held out because a blogger I enjoy absolutely hated it. She felt Albom was a king of trite sentimentality, a sell-out who makes big bucks each year for basically writing Oprah-like columns on the significance of 9/11, etc.
Dan is now under going chemo-therapy and Lynne has started a sponsored diet to help raise money for teenagers suffering with cancer, I'm hoping as many people as possible will help Lynne by donating.
The recipe called for 4 ingredients. 1 bottle of Carolina BBQ sauce, 1/2 cup packed brown sugar, 4 tsp. hot sauce, 1/2 tsp. paprika, and 1 bonesless shoulder pork (3 lbs). I chose to leave out the hot sauce as hubby is not a fan of spicy. It was also my first time buying shoulder pork and I was pleased to find that it is not expensive.
I will hardly be myself
It was relaxing simply to listen in to the sounds of the tidal waves. The weather for the day was pretty pleasant with gentle sunshine and beautiful clouds. When my friend and I found our way to one end of Labrador Park, we chose a spot facing the Reflections at Keppel Bay to practice sketching. I quite like the free-form structure of the Reflections at Keppel Bay. The challenge was to sketch in the surrounding plants, pre-war bungalows and the structures of the boardwalk to create a balanced and pleasing composition.
San Francisco is one of those places
It matters not to Him
against the cloud rack, a red eye
Southampton grew to manhood and, unlike the poet, was able to fulfill his dreams of military glory. He married, though not the poet's daughter, and himself had a son, in whom perhaps he saw reflected his own youthful beauty, as the poet had predicted. Called back to military action in France in his early fifties after a long period of peace, he died of a fever near the battlefield, five days after the death of his nineteen-year-old son. One can't help but wonder if, tormented by the loss of his son and the approach of the deadly fever, he recalled lines written for him by one long dead who'd loved him long ago. Did he remember as he lay dying:
This is an important thing for all us sports parents to remember — we are the adults. The other kids on the field, the other team? They’re children, just like ours.
So...now I'm off. And I plan to visit blogs this weekend. I also took Monday off, so I have four whole days with nothing much planned. Ah...I can't wait! In fact, I'm going to go have some wine right now. Happy Canada Day to my fellow Canadians, and Happy 4th of July to my American friends!
4. Saltwater Injections – You have seen the Fosters Farm “plumping” commercial (hopefully). Well, it’s not just hype, but a real thing. Manufacturers inject salt and other ingredients into raw meat (mostly chicken) to enhance flavor and increase the weight of the meat before it’s sold. Food it’s found in: It is mainly found in packaged meats. Meat that’s been injected may say “flavored with up to 10% of a solution” or “up to 15% chicken broth.” Regular chicken has about 40 to 70 mg of sodium per 4-ounce serving, while plumped chicken can contain 5 times or more than that amount, or 300 mg and up.
We men – wear sunglasses on the beach to protect our eyes from other eyes.
Also at Bandy Canyon, I saw this lush little bracelet, made out of an i-cord and some ribbon. I think this is absolutely gorge!
06-Phantoms-Ballad Of Paladin.mp3
I'm a few weeks late with this. Sometimes it takes some time to process the events of the day or of the world.
Highlanders and England backrower James Haskell received a three match ban today after being cited for punching his Cheetah’s opposite number Justin Downey during their last minute gasp victory in Bloemfontein on Saturday.
Thank god for friends. Thank god for all the investments i.e. expensive presents I have been dishing out throughout the years ( I kid... I kid!). Every time I hear my friends telling me they are excited for my new phase in life I feel that surge of energy in me. I am ready to LiftPullFlopx infinity (heehee you gotta read "Missing Piece Meets the Big O" guys & gals).
Like so many summers before this, too much is going on, all the time, even with rain-delays, for my one man operation to live it, record it and present it. The idea of doing a summer review in September came to mind, and then I realized the problem with that; nothing worse than looking back on a summer you can be part of, especially with the Fall chill creeping in. SO my suggestion to you and all is to take note of the days we have left, think of the sun and fun to come, and go get some (or some more) before it runs out.
2. Let soup cool for about 10 minutes. Working in batches, purée soup in a blender until smooth. You may need to add a bit more vegetable stock if your soup is too thick. Return puréed soup to pot. Stir in chives (leaving some aside for garnish) and simmer over low heat until heated through (about 5 minutes.)
We ended up doing a ton more traveling throughout the summer and the rest of 2010 and part of 2011 and then in March we gave up out titles to the 2011-2012 Czech Royalty. I was a bit worried at the beginning of the summer how the year would go but by the end of the summer I had realized I made many new friends and I got to know a family I would have otherwise never known. Thank you one and all for supporting me in the wonderful journey I had and I hope to inspire many other little "princesses" to someday try out to be queens themselves!
My younger daughter sent me this list, which is meant to show French people how they sound when they speak English - or possibly to instruct them in how to speak English:
1.coffee break
"Thank you."
I have a colleague who has been at our university for thirty years now. He teaches the children of his former students. Given another five years, he could possibly teach the grandchildren of his former students. How cool is that?
Q: You know those of us in the media throw around words like "curse." But what about the players on that team? In the Blazers' locker room, are guys asking: What next?
3) Rock stars with royalty names. Sorry Prince and Lady Gaga. Although we like some of your songs and you amuse us with your sparkly clown outfits, you’re still not monarchs. We’re downgrading you to: ‘talented peasants’ status and will refer to you respectively as “Wench Gaga” and “Plow Boy”.
The flowers themselves symbolize transience. Many times, it is said that soldiers were like sakura. They bloom suddenly, and die suddenly and beautifully on the battlefield. They are a symbol for our own existence- we live a short life, and our lives can be taken at any moment. It is best to enjoy the beauty of the here and now, because here and now is all that you have.
So the blog is launching today. I hope you’ll bookmark it and come back often. Tomorrow we’ll feature a guest post from the fabulous Kristan Higgins, who is the bestselling author of several novels that feature love, humor and romance. Her latest, Somebody to Love, was just released and has gotten wonderful reviews. She has a lot to say about how she does it!
I hate working out but rather enjoy walking and enjoying the out doors so that’s where and how I get my exercise.
Did anyone tell me?
My suspicions turn to the iphone app I have been posting with lately. I am staring at it all squinty eyed like a circus freak in a Tom Waits tale. Hey thats two pop culture references, two similes and only one miniature reference.
Please allow me 72 hours to get back to you. Tuesday after work, I have to bake a cake for a friend so I will be on the computer very little that night. Thank you all for your continued business and friendship.
I will not, however, entirely desert this blog, or its loyal readers. I plan to update you on my new life, and I doubt I will be able to resist the urge to comment on world affairs - particularly where they affect Stockport.
She was conscience of movement: every step down the stairs; the push through the door, the walk down the path to the sidewalk. Dragging herself to the bus depot, she sniffed all the way. The stress stirred up her nausea. She thought if she could just make it to the convenience store, she could pick up some liquid Gravol and take a few swigs.
It is more dearly bought than thou thinkest.
I Hold Your Hand In Mine, Dear
After this decision I picked up my training to prepare for the Galveston 1/2 Marathon in late February(my 4th 1/2) and the Oklahoma City Memorial Marathon(my first full) in May! Training was going great until “The Great Heart Scare of 2011” ! I started having chest pain while exercising and had to shut it down for 2 months while getting tested by a cardiologist! Luckily every test came back negative and everything was attributed to stress!
Muslimgauze was the musical brainchild of a British-born white male named Bryn
With St. Louis, the history is longer. My dad has always rooted for St. Louis. Maybe he inherited it from his dad, for he often told us kids how much our grandfather loved baseball (I'm pretty sure that's why my brother signed up for little league all those years). I also know that my grandfather's dad moved from Missouri to Idaho as a young man.
The arguments advanced by the Black community were consistently presented in a non-serious, even risible, light so as to give the impression that the Black educators and parents are ignorant of the merits of literature, mere emotional whiners and complainers, belonging to a hot-headed fringe. For example, after the decision was made to keep the books in the curriculum, the Halifax Daily News in an editorial was 'relieved cooler heads have prevailed', reproducing the racist notions of inherent Black emotionality versus the rationality of white society.
athleticism needed to dart in and out of traffic to evade blockers and play low at the point of attack with good leverage, however he
At our Matsuri we will have:
To Get Started, Visit our Contractor CE Course Page! You’ll find Air Conditioning Fundamentals and many other great Contractor Courses to choose from. We take care of reporting your CE credits upon successful completion.
Now, here at Turn Off The Television, we have NEVER forced an opinion on someone or told people in any shape or form that there is a right or wrong answer. We’re media. We might be small, but we’re still media. The JOB of the media is to present both sides of an opinion/issue and let the public decide for themselves what they want to believe, right?
Here are a few of the things I'm working on:
If you know one, you are blessed indeed.
I did want to share with you the amazing goodness of our Heavenly Father. He certainly gave
That weighed down like an old, stale wool blanket,
The Rangers are 11-2, have a 4.5 game lead in the division and the best record in baseball. Where have we seen this story before? Texas might be even better than the last two seasons. That’s terrifying.
Nevertheless, consultants within the business field spot few barriers that may hamper a company's efforts for a successful benchmark analysis. This happens when the aspects of core business processes, like quality, price, and reliability of the tip product or service created offered to the purchasers are unexamined. Also, when inadequate individuals or technology resources, like workforce, technology and funding are utilised, the aim of the benchmark analysis could also be irrelevant. The analysis for benchmark might not be acceptable when there's unwillingness or inability in accepting the legitimacy of business ideas or practices from sources out of the organization, as several might not be snug with amendment. However, such individuals ought to be assured that it's not implemented to seek out fault however is employed to assist the corporate grow additionally as improve during this business world that is evolving at a fast pace.
when morning came, the little miss was so excited to start our vacation,
In this chapter Unwin begins to get into the nitty gritty detail of how to lay out towns. Much of the chapter is an extended discussion on the influence on town planning of Camillo Sitte’s ideas. This was of great importance because Sitte’s 1889 book, City Planning According to Artistic Principles (1889) was not actually translated into English until 1945.
who could ever make her happy?
Yup.. it's easy to see that Beach Cruisers are gaining popularity lately. I can't wait to see if other bicycle manufacturers follow the trend, and produce more visually appealing standout cruisers for 2012.
Colorful Hugs everyone!
Jon was a nice guy from the start, he was respectul of women, kind, courteous... but I was still in love with the father of my beautiful blonde daughter. I struggled with this for a long time....years. I had wanted to marry Steven but that was not a wise choice.
I am also thankful that during the month of November I found plenty of things to be thankful for! Yes, I truly am blessed with family, friends and plenty of other blessings! I'm so glad I took this month to reflect on so many of them!
in some darkened and dank back street alleyway
Monday May 7, 2:00 – 3:30 **NOTE: Time Change**
I am living my favorite chicken story! We now have our first flock (they are five days old as I write this) of Buff Orpingtons. They are the next step in our journey to living of sustainable life, growing as much of our own food as possible and using renewable resources. I must say, though, that baby chickens are way cuter than solar panels.
And if this is the right job for us at this time, we also have choice in the attitude that we bring to work. If the job causes us stress during the day (there’s no avoiding that in most jobs), we have choice in how we handle that stress. At both Google and Facebook, employees are encouraged to undertake “mindfulness practice” throughout the day, exercises that help them “slow down and smell the roses”, or “slow down and make a cup of tea” in this case. These simple acts help us to become more balanced and to “live in the present”, and also serve to alleviate much of the immediate stress.
After several attempts to pray through my writing I just started to cry and tell the Lord I was just so sorry for how my mind was racing. I couldn’t make it stop, it was driving me insane. After getting this all out I then turned to the devotional I absolutely love – Jesus Calling by Sarah Young.
That so sad and heavy now is
Now on to Colt Ford’s “Ride Through the Country.” *cracks open can* I’ve got to get in character for this one, so humor me:) Yeah, I’m a southern boy. I’ve always lived in the South (well, not always). I’ve always despised country music. I married a woman who loves it. When I married her, I wouldn’t allow her to bring Kenny Chesney into our home (or any country, really). I’m exaggerating (about Kenny), but over the years I’ve hated two kinds of music…one of them has been country.
What then am I? Am I more senseless grown
This is a zipper spread in my Hands AB. I had never put a zipper in a book before, so this was a real challenge. Closed, the page is made up of magazine images and various scrapbook papers.
At the outset, I said the Scriptures show us the power of infection--
And Kirsten, in her own words about the stuff featured in the picture:
Just a quick post to summarise the results of the Ten-Four Challenge. (If you're new to the blog, Ten-Four was a self-imposed challenge to force myself to enter more competitions and submit more work 'to market', essentially by making ten submissions in the final four months of 2011).
her entertaining and ten grandchildren.
No one has ever made it so clear how the technology of telephones — and the spaces of telephones — work to forward the drama of films. And how different (disappointing/ difficult) everything became when computers became the technology that might advance the story. Oh, telephones.
J's demob wrapped up quicker than we expected, which was very welcome news! I had an idea late last week that he would be finished early and that I would be able to pick him up Sunday afternoon. Since the kids still did not know that he was back, we decided to keep the secret a little longer and I arranged for them to stay with a friend Sunday who would also drive them to school Monday morning. It was nice to have a little longer time than our previous one hour to spend alone together before I had to share his time :).
“Sizzle. Bubble” to convey the act of cooking.
The International Committee on Archaeological Heritage Management, or ICAHM, held its first conference on how to manage the world’s myriad archaeological World Heritage sites. This wildly varied array of places encompasses many of the most celebrated sites of human cultural accomplishment and catastrophe—everything from the pyramids and Roman fortifications to Mongol-era tombs and prehistoric rock art. ICAHM’s key job is to advise the World Heritage Committee about new sites proposed for the famous list. I attended as a guest of the Congress, which paid for my travel.
10:00 AM - 2:00 PM
He also tried to keep up with me and when he realized I would out-run him,
Its interesting to look over this because they are now the Establishment and oppressing those with a dissident voice. The rehabilitation of Sir Terrence Rattigan brings a a cool breeze sweetening the stables once again, as the dark clouds of Nihilism and Ideological drama recede. Rattigan's plays are once more being staged. (2)
Daniel shuts his eyes, pulls my head to him in the tight lock of his arm and forearm. I am content I can feel his warmth, his faint pulse at the corner of my mouth, where my lips are touching his skin, at the base of his neck. Sense the smell of warm moisture coming out of his wet t-shirt. Waterlogged, we’re barely breathing. The beat of his heart is enough to soothe me, and I can only hope that my embrace can appease him as much.
My youth pastor gave the members of my youth group this for Christmas last year. I encourage you to look up each of these verses. Just thought I’d share:
of a chipmunk hole, among nuts and seeds,
In the winter of the year 2012, there is a viral video going around the internet where a father admonishes his daughter for complaining about her chores on facebook. In the video, the father reads the daughter’s incriminating post and then “answers” her concerns. Now, I don’t know if this video is a fake or not, but I do want to say a couple of things about the dad. 1. He claims to be in I.T. He fixes computers for a living, yet he is wearing some kind of Indiana Jones – type hat. 2. He gives the entire chatising speech from an Adirondack chair in a non-descript grassy area. I mention this because I assume that most computer geeks do NOT own Adirondack chairs, nor have access to the outdoors. 3. He stutters. I do not mention this to pick out someone’s flaws. Lord knows, we are all flawed. This is a requirement for a human being. However, this dad stutters as if he’s memorized something and can’t quite remember it, like he’s auditioning for a high school play. 4. He shoots his daughter’s computer with a gun. Really? Isn’t that a bit much? Perhaps taking a sledge hammer to it was a little too reminiscent of the movie “Office Space”…However, I can’t help feeling that a man who owns an Adirondack chair, an Australian outback hat, and a glock – is not only not a dad, but also NOT an information technology employee. I could be wrong. After all, this is America – a land where people will shoot guns at laptops.
From here, you'll hop along to see what awesome creation Jak is sharing with you today, and just in case you gotten lost along the way.....here is the blog hop order.
So, now it's time to fly on over to Miss Susie Q, to see what she has for you. I'm sure that you'll love it! Click HERE to head to her blog! But before you go, here's some important info about tomorrow's release...
Before the Holy one of Heaven
The piece had been a recital offering when she was just twelve. Under her grandmother’s tutelage, she had refined her performance of it in the centuries-old house beneath the live oaks. Now, as she gently stroked the keys, she could almost smell the briny wind off Charleston Harbor; hear the creak of the kitchen floor as her mother and grandmother prepared the evening meal. And hear the bells of St. Philip’s.
In the cold Arctic, the animals had just come through a harrowing winter. In less than a year, some of them would be migrating to better lands. No one knows this, but the real reason the animals stayed in the Arctic was to test their endurance. Once an animal was judged to have passed its test, it was free to take off. Every year, there were different routes for the animals who had passed the test. A wagon came once at the beginning of each winter and dropped them off wherever they wanted to go. They could also go to other places around the world if they felt they wanted to endure a different climate. For this, they had to talk to their cousins and friends in far off places and enquire as to the availability of space in their environment. All that however is irrelevant here. This is the story of love, duty and loss in the harsh, cold north. This is the story of the Walrus.
want…andrew caneigie used it nd he became
** I would be wrong to pass this off as all my own work. Rather it is a bastardisation of hundreds of things I’ve read over the years all cobbled together into a Frakenstein-esque whole. I’d gladly name my sources if I could but unfortunately I’ve forgotten most of them, I seem to remember several copies of DWM, an editor’s note in a Virgin New Adventures book and one of those interminable Dr Who encyclopedia of the mid-80s all played a part. So well done to you guys!
* Assume primary responsibility for convening and facilitating a newly-created network of foster care Parent Advocates in the child welfare system
We see this oil throughout the scriptures.
And what about that financial insecurity? This is another dreaded thing I hear about from clients, friends and, of course, all over the news. How can financial insecurity possibly be a good thing? Again, as Shakespeare’s Hamlet said, “…there is nothing either good or bad, but thinking makes it so.” What did I learn from radical financial insecurity? That my true security comes from some place else. True security doesn’t come from money, a career, what kind of car I drive (or even if I drive). True security comes from knowing that I can seek and find whatever I need at any given moment in my life.
The coast of Bahía Solano is attractive for tourists who seek close contact with nature. During the month of May, this is the best spot for catching the famous flying fish.
Her research findings raise serous doubts regarding world-wide orthodox crime policy 'knowledge' on crime displacement and so called 'diffusion of benefits'. Read The Displacement Brief Here
So yeah that's why I want to be a Promo girl, freeze any emotion I have to have fun and party hardcore style. I mean if I am destined to be alone, I might as well as fun whilst being on my own right ;)
At last, Kostya broke into a large open chamber. The music filled the great space and brought tears to his eyes. He turned in a circle, looking for its source. The lamps along his shoulders grazed something metallic in the distance. Kostya whipped back to it, his lamps landing upon the object.
Because I will not stop your intention
WE said or 2 or 5 tehehehe I'll Keep Bugging her! Promise!
But O! That deep romantic chasm which slanted,
Thanks for reading along! Hmmmm. wonder who I will share these cookies with today??? Maybe my friends at Island Wheelies and The Salty Seagull! If you are Spring Breaking on the island, please stop by their venue in the Palmetto Shopping Center just north of the bridge by a few blocks!
Pub/bar or the Year
Edson, a burgeoning booze mogul of sorts, immediately became a prominent merchant voice in Manhattan, becoming the president of New York's Produce Exchange three times, serving his first term in 1866 before he had to time to even unpack his moving boxes.
As the title says,DT times,3
Me: No thanks. I don't need my sister giving me blue balls.
09 Vengeance 06:24
I just freehand drew half of the pattern on the left side of the posterboard, then cut it out with my razorblade (not a short process). Then, I flipped that pattern over to the right side and traced the pattern out onto the open posterboard so that the pattern would be the exact same. I then cut out that side with my razorblade. It took a while - I probably should've just bought the stencil from the website! :)
9:20pm: Relax
Shirt- My Bitch Shirt-(Like a boss shirt) – Blah
It was 1987.
Diesel and I went over to Debbie's for a visit. We had a run in the pasture. We petted the horses and had tea - with fruitcake. I know what you're thinking. It was unbelievably good though, handmade-by-a-Louisiana-woman-type good. That was Tuesday. She filled out the application for Diesel and we all traded e-mails.
4. Skilled tech support for registry scanning and fortify Windows XP with most effective security solutions
Sometimes I am overwhelmed when I consider that we have missed the first two years of our daughter's life. Wow. So much happens in the first two years of a child's life. I can hardly even stand the thought that we will be away from our other children for two weeks when we go to China to bring Little M home. But two years?! We have missed so much.
If she had done this as a kid, wouldn’t she have remembered it? If she could remember what her uncle did to her and her parents freaking out with her reading minds; then surely she would have remembered this. It appears to me he is alluding to all her powers, including her microwave fingers of fail. What do I know really though? I am just a fan while he is the supposed ‘showrunner genius’.
Most businesses’ mission statements are as slack and glib as most brands’ positioning statements – controversial, maybe, but true nonetheless. It is entirely appropriate to link the two because they are, of course, really the same thing. Each aims to capture the distinctive benefit and character of an entity and express it in a way that people will find it relevant. It is true that a mission statement is much more of an inward facing concept than a brand positioning and may never be communicated externally. But through acting as the guiding light for a business and its employees and as the banner they march behind, it should inform everything the company does and therefore become manifest in its behaviour in relation to the outside world.
But after going through this, it's easier to see the reason why
Tom Dalldorf from the Celebrator showed up so we headed for another tasting. I hung back to add the Centennials and some more fresh Cascade hops from Yakima (only a few, I swear!). The group had disappeared at this point so I ended up in the pilot brewhouse until after the hop addition. "" helped me find the rest of the group in the 200bbl cellar. I missed the first tasting (again) of Estate Harvest Ale but got a sample before we left.
3/10/12 I am thankful for
Beginning with the best watering holes in order of BART stops, three are accessible from the Montgomery Station. If you’re looking for brewpubs, this is the stop to reach two of SF’s five:21st Amendment and Thirsty Bear. “21 A” is almost spitting distance from AT&T Park and fills up like mad when the World Champion Giants play at home. Here you’ll find the beer that made them famous, their Watermelon Wheat (served with a watermelon wedge in lieu of the more commonplace lemon peel in other wheat beers.) But they have a hearty selection of other house beers ranging from sessionable to extreme and the food is delectable pub grub.
**All winners will be drawn with Random.org and posted on a subsequent post, here on this blog.**
“Father?” she called softly, hesitantly, as if her words would shatter the empty silence that surrounded him.
Gordon Brown became Prime Minister on 27 June 2007 and by 26 June 2009, he had met Rupert Murdoch 13 times:
A female by the name of Ella Chi hit the stage with her full band who sounded insane, so so tight, so full of feeling, it was a great vibe. Her voice was also extremely listenable, from the first beat of the drum my head was off… banging throughout her 20 minute set.
9. Avocado, cheddar, cumin, and chipotle chili powder on corn tortilla
Both eateries were completely worth getting lost. Kellen ate two HUGE pieces of pizza. Molly's will forever be the best thing I've ever eaten. Life changing. I am planning my next trip around a visit there... although, next time it would be fun to take someone who enjoys treats!
May 2005 District judge rules Nebraska version Unconstitutional (he is later overturned)
To communicate how devastating sexual abuse is, and to encourage others to seek help and to express themselves also, I wanted the images to be therapeutic, while using readily available supplies and producing the images as simple as possible.
of a loving Great Creator.
Creativity is far less subjective and ethereal than some make it sound. As much a function of our habits as our “genius” or inspiration, creativity takes discipline. Here are four ways to enhance your creativity.
Tiziano Ricci - bass, vocals
What is practical wisdom?
why haven't I used a drill before now? I drilled the holes for the knobs and attached the little box with a
Carter: Ineffective. He was seen as a micro-manager who even had to decide who was allowed to play on the White House Tennis Court.
So for my color theory class we were asked to do a three dimensional color wheel. So I set to work on creating a dragon. I created a dragon out of one sheet of paper and painted all of the primaries, tints, tones, shades and so on. It was a pretty intense project.
A couple of days ago, I was checking a dancing activity where the kids are supposed to jump up, turn around and clap. It is true that a lot of Japanese people have trouble distinguishing between L and R. Do you see what I’m getting at? Yep, there it was, in big letters across the top of the page:
strengthen your resolve.
that the song was not sung for me.
And that payment, that extravagant gift, leaves us with a glaring decision. We need to decide what to do with that extravagant gift. I’m sure when I received that 3 foot tall Go Go doll that I didn’t ignore it and I certainly didn’t ask to return it. I’m sure my eyes were wide and that I accepted that gift. I used that gift as it was intended.
I was SOOOOOOOO high. Higher than Auckland’s Sky tower – not the level where adventurous people jump from – but the very top of lt. And, when you are up there, alone, and scared of heights it’s very, very high. My daughter would love it and no doubt most travellers, and other kiwi, would love to be able to say “I did New Zealand’s highest parasail”
Tea!
JOHN O’DRISCOLL: I’ll have it for Mr Harry in a few days. I have been busy, and I am nearly there.
This weekend was all abou me. It was rainy and icky and I decided I hadn't had a all about me weekend in a long time. So nails done, which I do regularly anyway, bought some new shoes, colored my hair, had a massage and got a new "doo"
You guessed it. I am a huge notebook fan. Computers? Not so much.
At home.
scatter and duck behind empty kegs. Bolts of macroswill
By now it was mid-afternoon so Shane and I headed back down Schoolhouse Gap trail (1.1 miles) to get back on to Chestnut Top trail and back to my car waiting for us at the Y. Those last 4.3 miles really took their toll on both of us, and we were happy to get back to the car. I was pretty sore Saturday night, but very happy to have completed another 1% of the trails in the Smokies and visited a new part of the park. I want to go back to White Oak Sinks in a week or two and see it once the wildflowers are out in full force. It was a blast to have a weekend with Shane - we've hiked and camped a lot together with the Boy Scouts, but rarely just the two of us and I really enjoy his company.
May I bring it to his attention that he hasn't a clue who those posting on Junius are, so I guess he will be losing that case in The Courts in The USA - let us hope he has deep pockets as loose he will, just as UKIP's malicious case against Andrew Edwards when last they tried to suppress the truth from that source, or the case brought by Alan Hardy, or the case brought by John West, or the tribunal Case brought by Nikki Sinclaire, or the previous case brought by Nikki Sinclaire, or the case brought by The Electoral Commission and also when they lost their case against me and had such contempt for the British Courts that they have still to honour both their actual debt of £8.1/2 THOUSAND and their moral debt of £12.1/2 THOUSAND - clearly the filth in UKIP is not just confined to this revolting old man.
May Highlights
I had a prolonged meltdown over the weekend, the car was one factor in that.. I have some things I need to let go of.. jettison would be a better descriptor but I don’t seem able or willing to do so. After all these years I’ve become comfortable with my discomfort-it’s a known entity, predictable and therefore I tolerate. I place other things in higher priority than my comfort, safety, happiness etc…
The same holds true for pork. Back in the days when most people raised their own pigs and butchered, putting up pork loin, pork roast and bacon, all had more fat left on than you will find today. If you buy a pork roast now and it will be trimmed of most of the fat, but back in earlier days, people believed fat made flavor and left it on. Rosemary, thyme, savory, sage and hot peppers went into sausage, seasoned roasts and was used in mixes for curing the meat.
I master
We ate about a hundred delicious things, drank wine + beer in copious amounts, danced for hours, and per usual, laughed until our sides hurt.
We fished al? that morning ?nd ?arly afternoon. I caught a bag full of Yel?owtail and Albacore, and a few Barracuda to bo?t. Seem? th?y run in packs together. That w?s a gre?t first trip. M? d?d knew ?e ?ere going to catch fish, that’? ?hy he t?ok us. H? exp?ained later that he hadn’t taken us before because h? didn’t think w? could land ?ig fish yet. We?l, of course I s?id I was read? before this trip. He just laughed at m? and r?bbed my ?wollen head.
If you are not sure which ones will work for you, ask a supplier and they are sure to help you out.
Saute onions and carrots separately with some salt and sugar to taste over medium heat.
The kinds of economic and sustainability issues surrounding today’s virtual archives are not the ones that concerned scholars working in the pre-digital age. Instead, for those professors and graduate students, the main economic issues consisted of having the funds and time needed to travel to the archives. While travel expenses remain legitimate needs today, access to commercial subscription databases, funds to support one’s own digital projects, and the feasibility of embarking on such a project for pre-tenured scholars have emerged as pressing economic concerns. Similarly, in the past, academic libraries created and maintained archives for users (admittedly often with some faculty consultation and collaboration). Yet today more and more professors, graduate students, and even some advanced undergraduates not only use archives, but they also build them and must plan for their management, growth, and sustainability as well. In doing so many enter into collaborative partnerships with libraries, while others form part of an academic center devoted to digital work. Some digital archives aim to reach more than an academic audience and instead afford a space for public humanities. And in almost all cases our experiences working with searchable, sometimes multi-media archives cannot help but color our forays into traditional archives. Yet, what Ed Folsom has deemed “Database as Genre: The Epic Transformation of Archives” and other theoretical reconsiderations of “archives” are subjects for a follow-up post.
This Sunday is the tenth anniversary of September 11, 2001. Where were you? Most of us can answer that question. A startling number of young people cannot remember, they were likely too young to remember exactly what they were doing and what those smoking towers meant to the rest of us. I remember where I was, I was a new airman stationed in Aviano AB, Italy, looking forward to a peace time career and the benefits of serving overseas. My memories of 9/11 are a little chaotic, and filled with the opinions and worthless whining befitting any nineteen year old. I remember being righteously angry, and a little confused about exactly what we were talking about when it came to Taliban, Afghanistan, Islamic extremism...technical school in intelligence did not put much emphasis on unconventional warfare at that time.
The course, CS221: Introduction to Artificial Intelligence, which ran for 12 weeks last year, came at the right time. The fact it was being run by two of the biggest names in the field was a ”big drawcard”.
Biggest, most frustrating decision today is….what to buy for a wedding gift! We have a wedding to go to tomorrow. It’s more “business” related then “friendship” related.
Performances pop up at all the nicest places — along the River Thames, Hadrian’s Wall, the shores of Lake Windemere. Some 900 venues will be used for the festival, which runs from June 21-to Sept.9.
Secrets, secrets, and more secrets … ssshhhh!!! I’m sharing my favorite top 10 eye products, have fun reading and experimenting! Today’s trend … The luscious cat eye look of course! Bring out your inner Vixen, this SEXY look can be yours as well, follow the few easy steps listed below, and as always choose your products wisely =)
Thank you to all at Woodlore that supported us, and see you in the not too distant future.
are the poet’s stock-in-trade; no one knows the power of words like poets and writers. I believe in the power of the word. Lalo Delgado had an abiding faith in the power of the word. Proof of that faith is manifest in the thousands of words Lalo Delgado wrote and left for us in his poetry and prose, much of it still unpublished. I’m reminded
O-tus mini speakers can be positioned on your bike helmet, just above the ears. The music player is mounted on the back of the helmet. The wires are threaded behind the helmet padding to the player. The set-up plays your music close enough to your ears for you to be able to enjoy songs while still hearing what else is happening on the street.
Given the art of ‘light packing’ (literally) isn’t my bag; this feat was no mean one. After all, I was the girl who saw fit to bring four kilogrammes of jewellery on a Spanish beach holiday. Reported sightings of Mr. T in Andalusia were big news that summer. Despite such atavistic hoarding tendencies, my edit was merciless and the results, smug-worthy.
We coordinated dinner with our friends and had quite the feast. Doug made pulled pork (hint: cook it at home the night before then heat it up in the skillet with some vegetable broth) and grilled corn on the cob. Debby and Jenn made two types of slaw and peach pie. FYI - Angry cole slaw rocks!
He was recently sacked from a state body over his report on water safety.
(Bike not included :))
Workbox/File 12:Family Project-Make Egyptian jewelry (items in ziploc bag)
Yarn: Berroco Comfort Worsted
This may be surprising to some, but I am not 100% opposed to the idea of banning children from certain restaurants. Before you start thinking that I've lost my mind, let me explain. I do not agree with the practice of banning children in any way, shape or form, but I feel like it is that business owner's right to set the rules for his/her establishment. If he wants to make it "adults-only" then I think he should have that right. However, I think it is a very slippery slope. Also, by banning my kids, you are essentially banning families - and I can't imagine that would be good for business. My biggest issue with the concept is this: where does the "banning" end? We had rules and laws like this at a point in time and it was called segregation.
Dark colours such as brown and black can make us feel low.
Notes: Translating Zero Hedge: Your Wages Will Be Cut In Half
Better than a church bell ringing,
These are the steps of making her cranes.
But somehow, somewhere along the shifting sands of time, my non-snorer husband has (rather sneakily I feel) become The Snoring Man. How and when this occurred is somewhat of a mystery, but now I find myself tossing and turning restlessly whilst glancing at the red glow of the AWA's digital display which likes to inform me that it is now 11.30pm, now 12.05am, now 2.15am, now 3.24am...arghhh, cursed red glowing numbers.
Bradley Wiggins - Team Leader, expect him to be high on General Classification (GC), and you’ll see him mostly on Time Trials (TTs) and on Mountain Stages
UBG is made from Tri-Rec blocks, with HSTs in the corners instead of plain blocks. While I'm sure there's a similar pattern out there, I didn't use one. I quilted the inner and outer outline of the Tri-Rec blocks with variegated pastel thread.
Something with Pete Brown. Details are still being worked on, I was hoping something with IPAs would work because if you want to hear someone talk about IPAs you want it to be a man who took 3 months taking one to India the old fashioned way. Wales doesn't appear to do many IPAs, unless I'm looking in the wrong direction. Barley wines all over the place, but I've only found 1 IPA so far.
It’s baseball season. When I married my husband over nine years ago, he liked baseball, but he wasn’t obsessed with it. Now it’s a certifiable obsession. My husband has the game on the television all the time and he wears his baseball glove while watching the game. Our guest bedroom has become a shrine dedicated to the baseball god. My husband sits in the living room tossing the baseball up into the air and catching it with his glove. My husband turns ten years old when the Diamondbacks or Cubs play.
Hello Don,
We’re behind on our blogging, as usual, so we just around to doing this item for all you fans of celebrity chef Todd English, the womanizing seller of poltically correct pots on HSN.
Who would exchange this golden glow
más que sombra y que tierra,
But, why don’t I care anymore? This is the question I ponder. I think about losing weight. I talk about losing weight. I joined a biggest loser club at work. I exercise. But, these actions feel like lip service rather than a sincere statement.
But I have to say, their performance, while strong technically, was overly theatrical. The emotions they were trying to portray came out more exaggerated than genuine. And they just weren't able to communicate that fierce passion in their skating. And when they ended their program, they were in third.
dreaming of France is something I do well-hehe.
Over the past few years, there have been technological advance- ments in waterproofing products and systems; manufacturers are introducing new, long-lasting and eco-friendly products in the market keeping environment, safety, and health points of paramount considerations in view. Nowadays ‘Green’ being in the spotlight from all the sectors for its eco-friendly nature, waterproofing industry is not an exception!
“No. I’d like to hypnotize you to become more sympathetic to your wife’s condition. This isn’t so difficult to understand, Mr. Cavanagh.”
I just love how this bag turned out! Thanks for looking and have a great night!
Up next? Meringues.
Attempts to contact the police in Carolina, about 12km from the farm, were initially fruitless because they didn't answer their phone.
She was everything you could hope for.
the two salts work well mixed together with a little glitter, too.
Also you will all know how much I hate curtains and here is another reason why. I hate spiders much more!!! These curtains have come to me really dirty for shortening and the inhabitants were still in situ!! Arghhhhhhh.
The gist of the story is that the two main characters, Danny and Pippa fatefully meet on a ferry from Ireland to England and end up becoming friends. Their stories become intertwined in the here & now, and their side stories (disfunctional parents, confusing romance, general 20-something angst) also bind stories together.
A book full of kiss-ass girl spies? Yes. Yes. Yes. This book is amazing! All the characters are really fun. I particularly liked Bex. Just her British ways and how she helped Cammie with her boy problems. Well, these problems are in fact really major in the 'spying world' and so everything unfolds as we get to see how crazy like could get in Gallagher Academy.
PLACE: Bargain Barn
It's been quiet here at Best Family Adventures not for lack of activity, but due to major changes here on the Central Coast. We're off the road indefinitely as we enter another new adventure: life in our new country home.
See little dude in the red shirt? Isn't he adorable? Notice the earplugs? Erika and I noticed that the poor kid was in MAJOR sensory overload. It is horribly noisy in the hall and the kids were annoyed (see little girl) but this kid was in crisis. He was crying, rocking, and then began biting his shirt. The teacher was oblivious to whole thing. Then I remembered that I had stuck new earplugs in my purse that morning so I walked across the hall and showed them to the kid. He knew how to use them (clearly this is an ongoing issue) and after that, I swear, he was happy as a clown. Erika and I totally did a good deed! And this was AFTER we did our visiting teaching for February. We were just amazing that day. If I do say so.
True Christianity gives women freedom to become all that they were created to be, whether they CHOOSE to be a stay at home mom, or CHOOSE to be a CEO. or anything in between.
What’s it all about? Life, I mean. Is it micro or is it macro? Take, for example, the death of my fiancé, Bob Dobrow, in 1974. Was that because something like an O-ring broke, or because of some master game plan that said he had to go?
It mingles with the shards
Kalte Klares Wasser
The older sister of Mitt Romney’s former high school classmate said she has no knowledge of any bullying incident involving her brother and the GOP presidential candidate.
Nothing. He didn't do what he wanted to do after my head spun around. He didn't get mad at me for wigging out, I think because he knew I was right. There was no fight... no horrible words that would have exploded prior to ttwd. There was respect... there was love... there was compassion...
Well, the next day, I found more… in the family room! WHAT?
Me: "You take a bite"
little oil
As most of you know last year in June we had two little foster boys placed in our homes. They were 20 months and 10 months old.
Although Yosemite National Park is a destination of great wonder often times people arrive unprepared and the consequences can be disastrous. Here are a couple of tips for the traveler that wants to make the most out of their adventure to Yosemite National Park.
use the color purple somewhere on your card or creation - just that simple! It
Syncretism isn’t new, it isn’t random, and it isn’t dead.
It was a greyhound!
However, the eInk eReaders have been very successful despite their limitations. Last holiday season the Kobo became the most sold item in Canada’s ChaptersIndigo stores. From a user perspective, it’s a great device for the avid reader, as I mentioned in my review on the Kobo. The eInk technology doesn’t tire the eyes as much as a backlit LCD screen and is great for reading in a brightly-lit location, like the beach.
Rather than making her wait until later in the day or evening to unwrap her gifts (an extremely agonizing thing to do for a young kid), we decided to allow her to open her gifts in the morning. She loved this option! She received a few fun little gifts, her favorites being a few archeological digs, a new doll stroller and accessories, a pretty princess dress, and her very own tool box. When looking at the gifts, I am amazed at the broad range of things she received... from princess to archeologist, to hands-on construction. This kid definitely likes a wide range of things, and I am so proud of her for that. Kudos little girl!
we wanted something royal, stately that makes you feel like you've just stepped out of a wes anderson film.
8. Massive Attack - Dissolved Girl
and guttural utterances
However, just this Monday I went from being jobless to having two offers: one as an analyst at the firm I worked at last summer, and one as fiscal director/treasurer of a prominent nonprofit in the Boston area.
Excerpt: The Battle of Athens was much more than an extended gunfight between small-town political factions. Historian Dan Daley wrote, “It was a violent but decisive clash of two social and political cultures, between the past and the future of rural, state, and ultimately the federal government, and a reconfirmation of the deeply ingrained ideal that Americans can assert themselves against tyranny, even when it was taking place in their own backyard.” (This is an interesting look at a bit of American history I’d never heard before. I suspect that if it happened today, though, the National Guard would be on the scene within an hour. Not to mention the FBI, Homeland Security, BATFE, and a dozen other federal agencies. Ron P.)
and rouses a murder of crows
28. Is it just me or do high school kids get dumber & dumber every year?
_____I honestly have a fear that one day I'll leave my house and not be wearing any pants!
Hope you enjoyed my scrappy crop fun folks! I'll be back in a day or two to share the rest of my 52 week challenges, can you believe we are in week 4 of 2012 already? Wow, hope 2012 doesn't blow by as fast as 2011 and hope I can complete all 52 of the challenges this year! Come join us at Personalscrapper if you would like to for the 52 week challenge, it's a great way to get those pictures in those albums and those memories in those books! Have a wonderful week friends!
Luck relies on egress—laughing
Parents (probably) (especially if you’re a teenager)
Causes and symptoms
You are our sunshine.
You are part of the collective consciousness where we are in constant communication with each other. Nobody is alone unless they have cut their awareness off from the collective. This is done in the mind but does not mean you are not affected by this, it is a one way disconnection!
There is really little difference between solicitors and legal executives now that the restriction on becoming a partner has been lifted. However, legal executives may be disadvantaged in practice by not having qualified through the traditional channels in much the same way as solicitors from new universities are not usually given the same opportunities as those from the red-brick institutions. Nevertheless, the rise of the legal executive cannot be discounted – and perhaps in time the profession will become truly indistinguishable from that of a solicitor or barrister.
Ok, I was reading today’s yahoo article about makeup and airbrushing celebrities into obvlivion, and I was so excited to see something other than the “Stars Without Makeup!” articles you see floating around. I know that those “shocking” articles are supposed to make us non-celebrities feel better about ourselves, but why? If the intention is to show that stars look normal when they’re not being slathered with concealer and photomanipulated, fine. Everyone should definitely be aware that celebrities have a team of people to make them look their best. But is that the real intention? So often it seems to be to join in on comments of how “ugly” so-and-so looks without makeup. Isn’t that just perpetuating the cycle of unrealistic body image issues? If we’re looking at those photos and saying “Gross! Man, she should have put on some makeup!” aren’t we giving permission to the stylists, makeup artists, photographers, and photo editors to make them into someone they’re not? We’re giving them permission to create a false image that promotes dangerously unrealistic expectations about the size, shape, and color we should be, the way we should age, and the way our clothing should fit. We’re giving them and ourselves permission to de-humanize those people, because, after all, that’s “what they signed up for, anyway.” We’re saying that we don’t want to see them as real human beings, and we’re also saying that we’re not good enough “as is,” either.
This evening, the Tofu Muchacha and I went to a nice dinner at our favorite Thai restaurant, and then headed to the grocery store. Both of these took place in what is essentially our extended neighborhood. The place we call home. I mean... I already am feeling all jumbled up about my own home because of the terror of the cats, but that's for another blog altogether.
tough as nails
The word "busy" is seriously overused in our society. We've come up with all kinds of lame ass excuses as to what constitutes "busy." Busy isn't surfing the web, playing video games, drinking beer, writing blogs, watching movies, or going out for sushi. Busy is working two jobs, raising kids, going to school... doing things that matter and/or better your life in some meaningful way.
MAC Perfect Topping Mineralize Skin Finish
""For years, I deliberated over my options for creating a family. I knew the choice of an open transracial adoption of a newborn black child by a single, gay, white dad would involve daily and lifelong learning. Since I wasn’t making choices about just my own life, my concerns provided plenty of fodder for sleepless nights. My hope was, and still is, that we’d find a way through the challenges, all the more wiser and perhaps even closer. I plunged into parenthood, fully embracing the steep learning curve ahead, but still so unprepared.
Rise and Shine
Alaska by James Michener
Mama’s Holiday Wish List Meme
For the lid I used a lot of PVA glue, a vellum bird from the K&Co flora and fauna ephemera pack, some music paper from a large vintage collage sheet (and they mean LARGE... its going to last me forever lol) , more versamagic chalk ink through sequin waste and some gold polish. the pompom trim was a gift from a crafting friend. I simply glued the paper and bird on to the lid then used paints and more glue to build up texture (aided by the heatgun blistering the paint and glue).
Brief Digression Number Three: Some sources incorrectly don’t count that as an official victory, including the Southern Conference record book, with the league still listing The Citadel as having lost a conference record 37 straight games during this time period (the record is for consecutive losses against all opponents, not consecutive conference losses). However, during that era schools were allowed to count games against military bases (and AAU teams) as part of their overall record. The NCAA actually changed its record book a few years ago to take out references to the “37-game losing streak”; the mistake had been made long ago, and wasn’t fixed until 2004. (The actual losing streak was 30 games.) Besides, it’s not like The Citadel was catching a break playing service teams – the Bulldogs also lost that year to that same N.A.S., and dropped two lopsided games to the Parris Island Marines as well. The Citadel also lists a loss to Gibbs AAU for that season by a score of 121-65.
“Yes it will do.” I say, instantly annoyed by my father’s indifference; I match him punch for punch with my own. It brings me irritation that he doubts my prowess enough to check the walls.
While watching the anime Ergo Proxy, I saw this opening. My first thoughts were of a friend I hold dear to me. This friend was someone I used to love. I can still remember hearing this while lying my head on his chest. A bittersweet heartbreaking memory. Something precious and something lost.
Here are some examples of some combinations that I love. Maybe they will inspire you to make some mixed media postcards and participate in the International Mixed Media Postcard Swap Version 2.0!
On this historic day, otherwise known as Wednesday, 19 of your favorite humor bloggers are staging a WordPress coup. We have banded together to address the important topic, Better Living Through Reese’s Peanut Butter Cups.
Remember, knowledge is power and the truth WILL set you free! Do not be afraid to seek it out and own it!
Shutting down of migration after 1780s.
Hubert Ozwell is Asbel's younger brother. As a kid he is meek, soft spoken, and intelligent. Although the youngest of the two, it is stated that he would be better suited to be Lord than Asbel. His parents decide to have him adopted by the Ozwell family in Strahta so he and Asbel wouldn't fight over the Lordship of Lhant. Seven years later, he has become harsh and untrusting even to his own brother due to his parents "abandoning" him. He returns as a Strahtan lieutenant when the Windor agrees to the Strahtan military to occupy Lhant.
*Perfect for front or back
93% of new housing benefit claims since the election are from people who work and have a low income. Working isn't going to help those people deal with the cuts.
HAPPY 8TH BIRTHDAY, JAMES ALEX II!!
Charlie McCoy – Harmonica
I go in to get the notes. So what were these notes, that Tony had written about my fence? Well, apparently, he could not find any record for a permit for my pool or my deck, from the records. And he continued in his notes, that, “this would affect the requirements for my fence.”
The man in charge of the expedition was known as The Cardinal, I´m sure he had a real name but I can´t seem to find it. He held morning meetings. In the middle of nowhere when things had started to go awry, he still held morning meetings at exactly 0800 hours. You were supposed to pay very close attention to what he said during those meetings, but more so you were to listen to his pauses. Things happened during those pauses, the silence was heavy with meaning and you had to be very concentrated.
Dr. Gary Kohls goes through the little-known research that proves psychiatric drugs, like Prozac, are extremely dangerous.
Do you make time for your family? With them... not watching them like at soccer.
These steps may be more difficult to implement after elections and the accompanying shuffle in characters, but it does seem as though the time is right for focusing on improvements to human rights standards. I think NGO's and stakeholders should use this momentum and the spotlight of the EU to mount additional pressure on the government to do something other than signing agreements and publicizing them.
Just don't get a wristband. You won't like it, but I will.
You said that there is this meeting that happened, with I believe you said 57 different countries, was it?
We had a jam packed house (in fact we had to get extra chairs 3 times!), we found out who won the new logo contest (congrats to Jogindra Siewrattan for winning the contest and the $80 prize), and thanks to Dave ‘Big Deal’ Silverberg for hosting a night of down-right fantabulous poetry!
Yay for Natalie Portman! Her first nomination was for supporting actress in the (dreadful) movie Closer.
However in November 2005 Dave (aka HardknottDave) had other ideas. Lets build a brewery and start making beer. The first beer was racked on Christmas Eve - well what else do you do on a Christmas Eve! Ready for drinking on New Years Eve.
Chest pain, especially pain in right chest area, can be caused by conditions that are not at all related to the heart. As for example, formation of gallstones, pneumonia and liver diseases like hepatitis, can cause right side chest pain in women. Gas problems are also related to right side chest pain in women, while a muscle twitch, either due to inappropriate posture or rapid breathing, can cause pain in both left and right side of the chest.
If I was to choose one thing that really make me proud to be part of Utah's beer culture; it's the sense of community the breweries share with one and other. This sense of community has been made a reality for consumers as Squatters opens it's newest venture, the Vino Volo Ale House.
The park also contains a boating lake, children's play areas including animal stables and huge bird cage, a stream, bandstand, basketball and tennis courts. The Park's bandstand was at one time situated in the middle of the lake and bands had to travel across the lake by boat to perform.
He said Bolton, who is the provincial head of organisational development, allegedly made false travel claims.
If this stands, it makes the presidential election a shoo-in for Amr Moussa, the ex-secretary general of the Arab League known for his anti-Western and anti-Israel views.
Scroll down, get a bit of anticipation going
The moon came on the sky, lonely and sad like her. Its reflection on water appeared like her heart, shattered to pieces.
most of whom are still living,
If you are not familiar, real cask ale is beer in its purest form: keg conditioned without force carbonation, filtering or processing. We tap it with a spigot and let gravity do its work.
-that a toilet plunger can almost clear a stucco clog
With the unfortunate passing of filmmaker Krzysztof Kieslowski, cinema lost a great storyteller but he left behind an enduring legacy, most significantly Three Colors, a trilogy of films named after the colors of the French flag: Blue (1993), White (1993), and Red (1994). Each film explores the ideas that came out of the French Revolution: liberty, equality and fraternity. Kieslowski was not concerned about them as political concepts but rather how they pertained to the protagonists of all three films. Incredibly, he wrote, shot and edited them all in under three years and they were released at the prestigious film festivals in Venice, Berlin and Cannes to much critical acclaim. Previously released in a box set by Miramax, the Criterion Collection has produced their own edition with newly remastered transfers of each film and several new extras, giving Kieslowski’s films their trademark deluxe treatment.
But I had seen eHarmony commercials and was intrigued. I had some friends who had tried other 'popular' sites with no luck, saying it's no different from meeting a stranger at a bar. What attracted me instantly to eHarmony was the fact that they matched you with people.
I need to work on managing my time better and learning to leave things at work and have a personal life. I am a perfectionist by nature and I have a hard time letting things be (ex. it needs to be cute and visually appealing). I spend way too much time at school, but I'm hoping since I am teaching the same grade level and curriculum as last year I won't have to reinvent everything.
Throwing colours on the wall, in all the myriad hues of day!
Until then....
Buzz isn't the easiest guy in the world. Hell. He knows that. Indeed, Buzz uses his own trenchant bitterness, his temper, his neediness, his incompleteness to explore his relationship to his son Zach, who is a map-obsessed, calendaring-gifted, birthday-remembering, tender-hearted man who is loved by many but stymied in the land of The Normals, as Buzz puts it, by a low IQ thanks to a difficult, oxygen-deprived birth. Time and time again as Buzz and Zach weave their way across the country remembering the past together, Buzz is wrong and Zach is right. And Buzz is the kind of father who, after nursing his wounds, relishes that fact. Buzz is a bestselling Pulitzer Prize winner; sure he is. But what we love about Buzz after reading Father's Day, is who he is as a dad. Fallible, funny, trying, hurt, and loving the hell out of his sons.
140And only vocal with the Maker's praise.
Without going into a lot of details, in an effort to finalize what I planned to send to Avalon, I was working on making some changes to my manuscript and inadvertently inserted some grammar problems, missing words, bad spelling and other minor things.
For my brothers and sisters in Christ's remnant wherever you may be .. let us not be faint during these trying times but remember that His grace is sufficient and He will not leave us. These trials will strengthen us and test our faith so as to refine us according to His will. Let us each strive to cast off what is dross, take note of the lateness of hour and be in prayer for one another always. This abomination of man must fall and His kingdom will prevail. His promises are assured and His coming at hand. May we all be found faithful and joyous at heart at His return. Amen.
2) Rosie's 1st 4th of July! Nick, Rosie, and I went over to Mimi & Pappy's (my parents) for a cookout. Fun was had by all! Ollie wasn't able to attend the cookout (poor boy!), but looked very handsome in his patriotic bandana... see below :) I personally was NOT very excited about all of the LOUD firework activity this year, especially since Rosie goes to be at 8:00! Grrrr!!! All in all, it was a great 4th!
NOTE: And the devil that deceived them was cast into the lake of fire and brimstone, where the beast and the false prophet are, and shall be tormented day and night for ever and ever. Revelation 20:10
Dada was a member from the organizing committee. He had an Asian half sister who died of an accident. He said she was just my age when she died. So he called me sister. And honestly, I didn’t mind having a big brother in the lonely place myself.
Isaiah 60:2-3
“Good luck, little friends,” I say, and walk to the truck and climb into the passenger seat.
This was the focus of a presentation by Professor Gerald Yonga, Consultant, Cardiologist and the Chair Department of Medicine at Aga Khan University Hospital , Nairobi (AKUH,N) during a heart symposium at the Hospital.
For many decades smoking and alcohol abuse were the major risk factors for oral cancer. In contrast, smokeless tobacco use, while commonly misperceived as a common cause, has played virtually no role. Now, there is emerging scientific evidence that human papillomaviruses (HPVs), which are recognized to cause cervical cancer in women, may cause oral cancer. A new study by Anil K. Chaturvedi, from the National Cancer Institute, and investigators from five other institutions, provides evidence that HPVs have played an increasing role in some cancers of the mouth and pharynx (abstract here).
This months theme is Seduced by Chocolate & I did wonder if I could resubmit last months recipe. In case you missed it, it was Devils Food Cake & was about as chocolaty you could get! But that would be cheating & instead I made a variation on a recipe that was featured in Nigella's Feast book (my favourite!)
For instance, would you see the killing and eating of sentient beings (when it is not necessary for survival) as fair or just or moral if...you might be one of those killed and eaten?
1. Grate half of the onion on the holes of a box grater. Mix together the meat, onion, salt, and seasoning, kneading the mixture with your hands until it is smooth and sticky. (Alternately, you can grind the onion in the food processor, then add the remaining ingredients, pulsing to combine.) Roll into meatballs about 1 inch in diameter and refrigerate.
Also missed the memo that they would sound perfect and other-worldly. Third graders are not supposed to sound like that. In third grade, I learned to play "Hot Cross Buns" on the recorder.
how much more will the Father in heaven
This is great music! Hope you enjoy it. & stay tuned, because next month there will be a new installment in The Texas Blues.
Set size: 100 (70 base cards, 30 rookies) plus 60 autograph RCs
With my balls in my boots and my mouth full of shit,
Situation:
In all these things, the best is the original plans of God, childrens to be taken cared by the Father and Mother, and those are no.1 needs of Children more than anyone else in the whole world, in person.
You’re the sweet pain of bliss.
“You know it, my love,” she said as she ran her fingers across my cheeks and gave me a passionate kiss while leading me to the bedroom. She had her hands down my back and started undressing me skilfully without letting her lips leave mine. I took her nightgown off. Her bare body was exposed and my heartbeat was soaring upon seeing her bare chest. My lips made its way down her neck, slowly, and down to her breast. Soft and tender. I licked her breast and wrapped my lips around her nipple, circling it with my tongue. At the same time, my hand reached for her other breast and squeezed it. She moaned with pleasure.
~ My baby (OK, toddler) spontaneously says "please," "thank you," "you're welcome," "amen" (at the end of our blessing before dinner), "be excused?" (after dinner), and "I love you so much, mama" (when taking a rest from nursing). I swear, I still have to remind my older two kids about manners, but this one, she's got it.
Beefheart’s magnum opus deserves its status as the watershed album of antimusic; as a primer for the endurance required of voyagers into the realm of ugly sounds, it remains unparalleled. Composed under truly psychotic conditions by a hair-trigger Svengali and his band of merry pranksters, Trout Mask dispensed completely with the rigmarole of pop music, ignoring the zeitgeist of late ’60s psychedelia in favor of scorched-earth Delta blues and extraterrestrial skronk. The result was an artifact from another reality, a reality which Kevin Courrier goes to great lengths to bring into clarity. Interviews with Magic Band members who jumped ship to avoid being ground under the wheels of the uncompromising Don Van Vliet help to shed light on the genetics of this mutant creation, and a detailed postscript examines the way that Beefheart’s baby has sunk its phalanges into the underbelly of pop culture in the decades since it escaped from its cage. One hopes that the Good Captain is aware of the reverence that his legacy elicits today, in spite of a mainstream culture which glorifies conformity just as unabashedly as it did in 1969.
Aug., De Cons. Ev., ii, 46: It may perplex some how, if the Lord, according to the relation of John, asked Philip whence bread was to be found for them, that can be true which Matthew here relates, that the disciples first prayed the Lord to send the multitudes away, that they might buy food from the nearest towns. Suppose then that after these words the Lord looked upon the multitude and said what John relates, but Matthew and the others have omitted. And by such cases as this none ought to be perplexed, when one of the Evangelists relates what the rest have omitted.
When I left the Financial Times book desk, knowing of my passion, my colleagues gave me a sizable gift voucher for Penhaligons. This turned out to be no easy choice: were they aware just how many perfumes Penhaligons put out? After several visits and fistfuls of smelling strips, the choice narrowed to three: Violetta, approved by the Guide (but I already had two violet perfumes); Amaranthine by Bertrand Duchaufour (similar, to my mind, to his Traversee du Bosphore for L'Artisan Parfumeur, and anyway, I preferred TdB's drydown) and his new fragrance Sartorial.
I hope you’ll join me and tell me your memories.
slick foreheads of statues
Problem.
Appropriately, Provost Peter Lange strongly, and publicly, criticized the original version of Baker’s racist screed.
Resign all fear, all doubt, and all despair.
Remove from the sous-vide and cool in the blast chiller to 2°C , before allowing it to rest for at least two days in the refrigerator.
translated by Margaret Sayers Peden
I used the fabulous sketch from MFTWSC. What I LOVE about the sketches at MFT is that they coordinate with their stamps perfectly. It makes for using their products a piece of cake.
Would you like to compare the infant and child mortality rates of capitalist countries vs. socialist/communist/Marxist countries?
Our redemption by Jesus Christ began with His incarnation. When He took flesh, He became like us in everything except sin (cf. Heb. 4:15). In assuming human nature, He deified it. Since human nature is one, this gave us the potential of being deified as well: not deified by nature and Sonship, as Christ was, but deified by Grace and adoption.
And disaster is what we've got.
6. Furthermore, my bank balance is fast resembling an Eastern European supermodel - skinny and surly looking. If I withdraw any more money from the ATM - it might just spit my card back out at me. Hence my reticence to pony up for fancy 'shapewear' undies. I've discovered that M&S tights do the same job. Got some gorgeous leopard print beauties (€8) with a built-in tummy eliminator. Feel as svelte as a young springbok!
This blog was just meant to be a simple venting of my apparently overly sexual way of thinking and things that I felt needed to be said about sex because, as I said, I LOVE sex.
Check out this picture of Jesus. It starts out rough, but read to the surprise ending.
Hubby: "I matter to other people."
Option: puree all the ingreditents for a finer dip.
I was seriously pissed off with a few people this weekend. A minority of people, thankfully - but way more than I'd want to deal with. I'm talking about the 'up the punx' types who don't give a shit about any of the politics or helping the scene in any way whatsoever, just proving how 'totes punk' they are. The thing is, it's not just not giving a shit - it's one thing to not be interested in politics, it's another entirely to actively try to ruin the work of people who are. It's one thing to not be able to/want to put gigs on or get involved in the legwork of the scene, it's another to act like such a fucking arsehole that the promoters who do put gigs on might not be able to in future.
I don’t remember where I picked up the Dragons of the Cuyahoga, by S. Andrew Swann. Chapters or Indigo just as likely as anywhere else. I don’t even remember when I picked it up. The why is obvious: It has the word “Dragons” in the title, and blue-black leathery, spiked dragon on the cover. That always gets my attention. There aren’t enough great books out there featuring dragons. Far too often the dragons are unintelligent destruction machines, or worse conniving semi-intelligent vehicles for malice.
Donald Sutherland (Without Limits)
Her daughter, my beloved great-grandmother, Anna, remembers it as a time of unspeakable sorrow for their little family…
2) Strong and brave
3. What Kind Of Animal Are You?
While waiting for the votive holders to dry, I assembled my nest with this beautiful bird and her eggs. I attached it to the base of the "cage" and then added the votive holders and these beautiful looking and smelling robins egg blue color candles! It is such a beautiful piece. You can use it as a centerpiece indoors or you can hang it up outdoors. Either way she's ready to fly....well not really because she is glued down, but you get the point! ;)
A Gentleman’s dress-sense sets him apart from many of his contemporaries in this day and age.
TNA Senior Executive in Talent Relations, Al Snow is headed to the ring, with Alex.
After the movie, it was about 12 at night and my cousin and her friends were planning on dropping me home first before they all went to hang out. However, I made the bad decision of calling my dad (who was probably really drunk at the time) if I could stay out a while longer to go eat. Of course, he said yes! Which at the time meant that if my mom got mad at me, I could blame it on my dad. Except, my mom was already asleep at the time, so what I had to do next was to plan my quiet entrance to my room, once I got home.
Remember that text contained within images won't be picked up by search engines. Only actual text on the page will be indexed.
Andrew Love - saxophone
Power density: meh. Lots of FinQuant code can run on a handful of cores. The Low Latency HFT folks cannot really afford many L2 misses. The NSA boys are talking about supercomputers for crypto not binary protocol parsing.
“You Rock my World” – The Hague 6 to Ocampo
Things have been very hectic lately. Over the last month or so, I have been working constantly on my plans for a brewery. So much that there is a constant buzz in the air. Friends, family, and even acquaintances have been asking me about it. Most want to work for me, but most want to be a part of it. They are offering to help out, advise, supply labor, and offer money. Even my Doctor was excited about it. That has to be a good thing.
Today we head to the Mercado Negro ‘black market’ for a wonder around. This market is eight blocks long. We get lost it is soo big. You can buy everything here from shoes and clothes to meat and furniture. After spending hours wondering through the market we get some lunch. I get spaghetti cabonara for 35 Bs (7). We then head to the post office to send our goodies home. My parcel costs 238 Bs (45) to send home. It is really expensive for Bolivia. We then head to the archaeological museum however, it is closed at the moment. Since we are near the San Pedro Prison we decide to walk there for a look. I read a book about an English guy in this prison and about how corrupt the police guards are and how he use to take tourist for a tour of the prison. People still go to the prison and ask for the tours, but they stopped a while ago. Once the English man was freed from prison, the tours were no longer safe and it didn’t take long until some tourist were attacked. Now the guards will not let anyone in the prison, no matter the money you pay to get in. We stand in the park opposite the prison and watch as the prisoner’s line up to head back in (yes the prisoners get let out during the day if the bribe the guards) and watch the wives and children head back from a day of work and school (yes the wives and kids live in the prisons with their criminal husbands/father). It is just crazy to watch this. No where else in the world would you see so many people entering and exiting a prison!
If mangoes are well and truly gone from your local grocery, experiment with other fruit (bananas, oranges or even grapefruit, for example).
The so-called "secrecy bill" is centre stage in Parliament again this week, as various civil society groups, state organs and the media make oral submissions to the National Council of Provinces ad hoc committee on the draft legislation.
So it was off to Lake Nicol and the cool water we had heard so much about north of Tuscaloosa proper, out beyond the yacht club, tucked between the quarries along New Watermelon Road. We had a cooler of soda pop and sandwiches. We were planning a soft day. I left the books at home, the novels for that survey in modern British literature, my half-drafted short story about dog racing. What was it you left behind that morning?
Get away and get out on my own
Travel doesn’t come cheap. Yes, there may be discounted airfare or accommodation but these types of offers are either last minute or you need to book way back in advance.
I don’t wear long flowing skirts anymore. No, I don’t want to wear a tight skirt on a bike and rip it. Already I am left with only one business skirt above the knee, with a ripped inner lining. The hunt for a skirt petite proportioned for me, has been now 2 years long and it’s not over. I find it difficult to locate tailored shirts for the office without spending a lot of money. Cycling around in my lovely creamy white dress shirt and making it more slightly sweaty around the neckline, means more frequent washing and wearing out the garment sooner.
Just a few updates:
Card #104 - Addison Reed
Context on the show: Homer tries to explain the history of rock and roll to his kids.
We have seen two material specifications mentioned for reactor vessels so far; "Nuclear Reactor Engineering" (Glasstone/Sesonske 1967) points out that these two steels are more properly described as "high strength, low alloy steels" since the normal "carbon steel" description is not specific enough. Following are this volume's stated metallurgical compositions for these two materials:
Using the moniker of ‘Ares Lin’ on the Lion City Forum, he vented his anger online after being involved in a brawl with a group of Singaporeans over a staring incident:
Truthfully, evil has got it right.
$50,587: Your Share Of The National Debt. (U.S. Treasury Department Accessed 4/10/12; U.S. Census Bureau, Accessed 4/10/12)
Another thing I will be concentrating on this summer is finding a job. I'm not sure if it will be seasonal or something a bit more secure, but as long as I get a job and start saving up money for the coming fall, I don't care. Between my job and getting my license, you may ask "but how will you ever have time for any fun?!" but never fear I always have the nightlife and my disneyland pass.
So that's my sewing space, my little area of creativity. Not an attic, or a room, or a shed, but a cosy little space just for me. All my scissors, needles, pins and cutters hidden away in the top section, along with jars of buttons (aren't washed out spice jars just so handy for button storage by the way?), patchwork templates, hole punches and various keep-away-from-small-people things. The drawers are just the right size for my stash of ribbons and trims, and the little cupboard section at the bottom holds my stack of felt and a big bag of washed fleece for toy stuffing. And best of all the pull down front means a fab surface to work at the sewing machine:
Re-coat the skillet with 1 tablespoon oil. Place over medium-high heat until hot. Add carrot, mushrooms, onion and potatoes; saute 5 minutes. Return steak to skillet. Add thyme, salt, pepper and beef broth and stir well. Cover, reduce heat and simmer for 50 minutes or until meat and vegetables are tender, stirring occasionally.
Alice, predictably, enjoys watching herself onscreen:
Dora…after a huge pause: “Did you see Swiper?”
Things to know about Mountain O’ Mounts
I've covered the great Cary Grant comedy Bringing Up Baby in a previous post, and here we have another superb and sublime bit of hilarity from the screen's most revered leading man of all time. It's interesting to note that Grant himself never felt confident in his performance in this picture--rather, he believed it to be one of his worst, and completely over-the-top. However, the untold masses who have derived great pleasure from this movie would beg to differ.
The two women, who were passengers in the drunk driver’s car, were ejected from the car in the middle of 395 south bound. Marko remembers seeing the Pentagon on his right hand side. What was troubling was not the accident itself, it was the brain of the two female passengers that were exposed on the highway floor, and the body parts that were scattered around the crime scene. A flurry of feelings about things that had happened to him resurfaced, and he returned to the Fort Bragg.
Hope everyone is enjoying their weekend. I have freebie 3 for you tonight. Thanks to everyone for your feedback about the freebies. It sounds like most of you enjoy the mix, I will try and split it up half and half to post a few more brag book pages for those of you who've said you enjoy those. Sound fair?
Something corgi related would probably be easy to find, as the corgi is the Queen's favorite breed. Or perhaps she'll find sweets in Jubilee-themed tins? I've asked her not to spend too much time looking, and not to spend too much money on me either. After all, it is their vacation and they should savor every minute doing things they enjoy. Even so, I'm looking forward to some little surprise.
I grew up in a diverse neighbourhood settled by immigrants the world over, with traditions galore. Just walking down the street during the holidays, you'll see a marriage of blinking Christmas lights with various sized menorahs and dreidels in shop windows. The aroma of food baking, music blaring, languages reverberating, the collecting and sharing of chocolate coins, Turtles etc: the joy of the holiday season - this is what I grew up with and loved so dearly as a child. . . and still do.
My main contributions to this multinational recipe are: 1) to add metric weight conversions for those who don’t use the US cup-and-spoon volume system and 2) to replace the slice-and-bake method with the cookie-scoop-and-bake-or-freeze-unbaked method.
The Galápagos archipelago uniquely exemplifies the delicate tension between a pristine environment and human curiosity and intervention. Over 5 years, 12 artists visited these remote and beguiling islands returning home with film footage, drawings, photographs, sculptures, sounds and imaginings. The resulting exhibition offers a surprising and contemporary insight into the cultural reality, the human stories and the living laboratory of Galápagos.
Doesn't he look like a totally different kid?? He is right. They will grow back (which apparently is a good thing because some of the women at church just about went into shock when they saw him yesterday).
The U.S. Department of Justice Community Relations Service, UAH Muslim Student Association, Birmingham Islamic Society, Interfaith Mission Service, UAH Office of International Programs and Services, and the International Services Council of Alabama are helping the U.S. Attorney’s Office, the FBI, and the Huntsville Islamic Center present the workshop.
We have been working hard here at the new place to get it all adjusted and organized and comfortable. I have it mostly there right now. The hard part has been with my work schedule lately. It has since calmed down (beginning this week). It is really hard to maintain a house when you aren't IN the house. I seriously was working 2 7 hour shifts, 3 12 hour shifts and 1 4 hour shift each week. It was CRAZY! Plus, most nights I brought work home with me. That's just the way it had to be for a while there. I actually have work that I brought home on Friday that I had planned to have done by now, but the way I see it, I don't have to work again til Wednesday so I have a little bit of time yet. And worse case scenario, I do that work on Wednesday while I'm at work. No biggie. But I'd really like to be caught up at work before I start my work week on Wednesday. Ya know, just for once.
Joined close to 2000 fellow union leaders and tripartite partners at May Day Rally 2012.
Today I did a quick drawing and instead of feeling I should have got up, I felt happy to have created something before the day has even begun.
And that is literally every game there. Because if you had a booth larger than my apartment with a single screen playing your preview trailer your game wasn’t really there, ass.
About SmartSign
“Higher levels of immigration are the last thing we need with a recession approaching.”
Instead of calling the friend or scheduling a time to go to Cabrini Green, the cleaning person steps into the corridor and shouts over to another woman that Helen wants to interview her. What're the odds that they all just happened to be within 10 feet of each other? Small world, my ass.
“What’s going on with Google Product Search (GPS)?” is a question I’ve received a lot lately. GPS was a smoking hot channel for most of the last 18 months. But traffic and sales comps since about March 2011 have been down, in some cases substantially. Well, several things are going on, but I think a major one is that Google is starting to more aggressively monetize GPS by shifting traffic away from Google Shopping results and toward its revenue generating programs – Adwords (paid search ads) and Product Listing Ads (PLA). This is a hypothesis of mine, and I have no inside or other information from Google confirming or denying this. Below I share why I think this is happening and some of the implications for retailers.
mix all wet ingredients, except butter, together loosely in your measuring cup (I never stir the egg up too much, but enough so it's 'broken')
4. Caffeine is very taxing on the liver and kidneys who are continuously removing caffeine and it’s many by-products
All of these three attack plans will work if Germany marches directly from one victim to the next. Each plan requires the skills of a dedicated diplomat in addition to those of a good field commander. One without the other spells doom to any German hope of victory. As I said, it isn’t easy…but it is possible.
Here's one of those older players that you just have to root for. At age 39, Whitney appeared in all 82 games this past season and scored an impressive 77 points (good for 12th in the NHL)! He chipped in with a goal and two assists in round 1 of the playoffs, where his Coyotes triumphed over the Chicago Blackhawks.
A doting father’s sudden absence from the six year old’s life left a deep emotional scar. The child became inconsolable at night. Not just stirring, but screaming, sobbing; making frequent intrusions into her mother’s bed. Simone tolerates the addition of a small child between her sheets at first. The little body is consoling and she feels for the child, once so close to her father. She understands her feelings
They later changed their name to “The Thamesman” before finally settling on “Spinal Tap” after deciding they needed a name with a “harder edge”. Their first hit single as “Spinal Tap” was the 1960′s Flower Power Rock Anthem “Listen to the Flower People” in 1968.
“I think there is a crowd outside my room, let me check.” I said to myself.
The Commission tested the EMP susceptibility of traffic light controllers, automobiles and trucks.
Why people paid more attention on a suicide bomber killing 10+ soldiers rather than this disaster destroying the world??
Love is stronger than any force.
fresh peaches
Cook five minutes; that's the plan.
For example, I can now travel for a few weeks without them, be more impulsive, be more free. The baby years are fun but the big kid years are easier and freer! I loved having babies but I am so enjoying being free of that sort of commitment to home and hearth. I like working and having money and I like the three trips I have planned between now and March 31 most of all!
Beach. I’m really tuned into sounds – maybe because I’m in radio – and I love listening to waves crashing or the whooshing of a seashell when you hold it to your ear…Grams calls it the heartbeat of the ocean.
That's all I did...for five weeks.
And probably should.
After leaving that church we made our way back to the chocolate festival. It was freezing cold but there was a layer of fog over the city, and the streetlights and moon made a beautiful purple glow. We went into a few stores and then back to the park, where we played on the statues in the park. We hesitantly made our way to the train station, not wanting to say goodbye to Bologna.
Loads of people die, more seeds of discontent and paranoia are sown amongst the school, they’re told if the Undertakers are taken in, they’ll be allowed free, and so forth.
It's in these kinds of hubs that you feel the life of a festival gather and lift. A festival is much more than just a bunch of acts, and venues like the gardens provide a focus for the quickening it also represents. The night was balmy, the conversation delightful... And in the way of these things, one drink led to another and, well, here I am, facing my busiest two days in Perth, with a vague space where my brain used to be.*
So today, during a pretty boring hour of a lesson, I started photographing her and figured I’d use the photos as the focus of today’s blog. Photographs continued at home. I think she got annoyed with me in the end. I love today’s shots.
No ribbons, gifts or parrot in the video. Instead some lithe young women do a Morris dance routine that's not that far from the meat of Legs & Co's, in Oldfield's huge studio as he sits impassively by playing bodhran. And acoustic guitar. And tambourine. And accordion. And kettle drums. Alright, Mike, you're a multi-instrumentalist, we get it. Look like you're having fun at least.
I guess I should interject here that for all of the above purchases, there should be subsidies for those unable to afford their computer, or Bibles, or firearms, up the full amount of purchase, just like for health insurance.
I'm telling you right now that the European hard right is on the rise, and that this world and those who would order it cannot and will not tolerate that, just as they did not tolerate National Socialist Germany. I am trying to understand that as well, and that's earned me some jabs and body blows as well.
And here is Yoga Dottie from our Totally Stampalicious Bugaboo Line by artist
TheRat; you are a monster. I can’t believe you did that to me. You knew I was going to have to watch, and you knew I’d watch the whole thing. Then I then link her to a youtube video of a man being buttfucked by a horse. The description below elaborates that the man was too ashamed to seek medical attention and subsequently died from internal injury.
Today was such bright and perfect spring day for us. So did I finish the laundry??? Nope...Did I did some spring cleaning? of coarse not...Did I sorted the winter clothes...no no no...not at all
The Athasian sloth is a large, forest predator that haunts the jungles of the Forest Ridge. These deadly predators especially love to feed on halflings and will often attack them to the exclusion of all others.
I completely blame Young Adult author A.S. King (Amy) for my getting SMASHED in the face with a soccer ball not once, but twice, this past weekend.
